  ...and every time I think about this, I keep thinking: if one of the growing 
  mass of Celeron hyper-ultra-overclocking crowd put up a webpage detailing how 
  they modified a fishtank, a small water pump, and a supply of synthetic blood 
  plasma for use as their latest handy-dandy cooling adventure, they'd be 
  arrested. -- Mark C. Langston 
  What for? There's nothing illegal going on, unless they are stealing the 
  flourinert. -- Paul Tomblin 
  Ah. But, you see, those misguided kids aren't going to stop there. They 
  probably listen to that horrible goth music by Marylin Manson[0], and own 
  black clothing. Why, I bet they strip nekkid, cover themselves in Nutella, and 
  dance around the CPUs at midnight![1] Society must be protected![2] Sure, 
  today it's flourinert. If we don't stop this now, they'll be stalking the 
  halls of our fine schools, looking for victims to drain so that they may 
  further their evil cooling desires! Act now, before you catch your son or 
  daughter leering at that spare centrifuge down the way! Petition your local 
  school board to place these authentic anti-overclocking tiles in the 
  entranceway of your school, before it's too late. 
  This rant brought to you by Your Friend The Media(TM), in association with the 
  Mineral Oil Preservation Society. 
Mark C. Langston 
%
  No, zombies are a marvel. -- Sten Drescher 
  I thought they were Just Another Thing Wrong With NFS. -- Adam J. Thornton 
%
  Best viewed with Netscape 4.7 for UNIX/X on a 1280x1024 resolution with 24-bit 
  color depth, maximum contrast, minimum brightness, in a 1000x960 window placed 
  in the exact center of your display with this window manager configuration 
  [etc.] -- Unk. 
  "...with a colour temperature of 9300K using barco phosphors and connected to 
  an AGP Matrox G200 via 5 individual RG179B/U coax cables with a contact 
  resistance less than 0.1 mOhm..." -- David Jordan 
  On an <insert impossible to find make of monitor> here. -- Peter Corlett 
  Monitor? I was thinking along the lines of a UKP 10k data projector placed 
  3142mm from a 2m diagonal screen in a semiconductor clean room with no more 
  than 5 10um particles per cubic metre of air... 
  Nah... That's going too far... What you want to say is, "Don't look at this 
  page, it's crap." -- David Jordan 
%
  I never really understood how there could be things that would drive you 
  insane just because you knew them until I ran into Windows. 
Peter da Silva 
%
  I think that we should officially make this the sysadmins credo. We'll call it 
  "The Abigail Oath" and require all new sysadmins to swear it. 
  Well, without the layoff part, maybe something like this: 
  I am hired because I know what I am doing, not because I will do whatever I am 
  told is a good idea. This might cost me bonuses, raises, promotions, and may 
  even label me as "undesirable" by places I don't want to work at anyway, but I 
  don't care. I will not compromise my own principles and judgement without 
  putting up a fight. Of course, I won't always win, and I will sometimes be 
  forced to do things I don't agree with, but if I am my objections will be 
  known, and if I am shown to be right and problems later develop, I will shout 
  "I told you so!" repeatedly, laugh hysterically, and do a small dance or jig 
  as appropriate to my heritage. 
Mike Sphar, re: Abigail's resignation letter 
%
  If men are from Mars and women are from Venus, there's going to be one big-ass 
  fight over where to set the thermostat. 
Jim Rosenberg 
%
  "As a member of the First International Church of the Fucking Christ, I 
  believe it is blasphemous to mention His holy name without including His holy 
  gerund. And, moreover, it is a mortal sin to remove His holy name, gerund and 
  all, from any text in which it appears." 
Chad R Orzel 
%
  I'm an apatheist. The question is no longer interesting, and the answer no 
  longer matters. 
petro 
%
  People who are willing to rely on the government to keep them safe are pretty 
  much standing on Darwin's mat, pounding on the door, screaming, "Take me, take 
  me!" 
Carl Jacobs 
%
  [...] and the French an excuse to use their traditional battle cry. -- 
  Firebeard 
  "We Surrender, here, have my daughter."? -- Paul Tomblin 
%

  IBM tells us mainframe types _NEVER_ _EVER_ to apply software maintenance to a 
  running system, as "the results may be unpredictable". The IBM software types 
  talk about this sounds like people who do it should expect werewolves, 
  vampires, and nameless Lovecraftian things shambling drippily out of darkness 
  into the dimly-lit dinosaur pen to eat the techies' souls or to carry off all 
  concerned to Places O Which It Is Not Good To Think. 
  IBM lies dreaming in its fastness at Poughkeepsie. 
Mike Andrews 
%
  Windows gives you a nice view of clouds so you can't see any potentially 
  useful boot time messages. 
Bill Hay 
%
  If the Internet is almost democratic anarchy, are Admins the priesthood of a 
  bureaucratic, conformist, psuedo religion, trying to impose their will on 
  people who would rather be getting drunk and laid and doing things randomly? 
  -- Chris Hacking 
  No, the Admins are the priesthood of an irrational, anarchistic, random, 
  pseudo-religious hardware platform, trying to impose their will on people who 
  would rather be using us to avoid real work. The Admins are the ones who would 
  rather be getting drunk and laid and doing things randomly. 
  Doing things randomly is what Admins do best.[1] <clickety-click> 
Joe Moore 
%
  IBM's vision is apparently to make IBM hardware "scream with Microsoft 
  software" -- The Register 
  I have visions of screaming with (at and about) Microsoft software, too. 
Joe Moore 
%
  My Win98 installation has been doing that for months.. German, English, and 
  Dutch, all intermingled. What's so frightening about that? -- Jasper Janssen 
  You mean seeing "Reboot Macht Frei" on your screen? -- Greg Andrews 
%
  I want a Frog Magnetic Levitation Hockey game. 
  It would be loosely based on an Air Hockey table. 
  It would require remote controls so it could be played from far enough away 
  from all that magnetism that our Leathermen wouldn't go tearing straight 
  forward through our butts. OTOH, Naked Co-ed Frog Magnetic Levitation Hockey 
  could have its moments too. 
  This new game might provide hours and hours of recovery. 
Anthony DeBoer 
%
  along with a metric assload of rebar -- Carl Jacobs 
  What's that in Imperial arseloads? -- Alistair J. R. Young 
%
  NT-powered-cellphones: who do you want to hang up on today? -- Tanuki the 
  Raccoon-dog 
  Microsoft would make it a car phone. No, I mean it'd have a car built in. -- 
  Joe Moore 
  Sun would make a Java-powered car phone. It would only go 10 km/hr, and you'd 
  have to stop at every Starbucks for a refill. -- Paul Tomblin 
%
  [A]ctually it was almost in final approach, and the hydraulic assist unit for 
  the rudder decided, "Hmm. I think the rudder would really rather be...all the 
  way to the LEFT. Oh, no, wait, the pilot's telling me this is not the case. 
  Screw him, he never listens to *us*. I'll show HIM. HOW'S IT FEEL, YOU 
  SANCTIMONIOUS LITTLE HAT-WEARING WANKER?" 
  This is why I refuse to get on 737s. Hydraulic assist thingummies apparently 
  get crotchety in their old age, and in dog years, most 737s are dead. 
Carl Jacobs 
%
  Be a better bastard. -- Josh Brandt 
  ...and the world will beat a luser to death at your door. -- Carl Jacobs 
%
  With any luck, neither will his vache-orkers. -- Jasper Janssen 
  ITYM "orqueadors des vaches." HTH. HAND. -- Eric The Read 
%
  And if you know *precisely* where it is, you can be guaranteed that it's not a 
  Heisentowel. -- Unk. 
  No, no, no. It could still be a Heisentowel -- he'd just have no clue how fast 
  it was. -- Devin L. Ganger 
  And what direction it's traveling. -- Mike Sphar 
%
  I'm sorry, but comfortable is the last thing I want in my server room. I want 
  it unbearably cold, and noisy. I want items scattered dangerously around the 
  floor. I want random floor tiles to be missing. I want a very old sandwich of 
  undetermined origin sitting half-eaten in the corner. I want the first thought 
  of any person that enters my server room to be "Dear $DEITY, I must get out of 
  this place IMMEDIATELY!" 
Mike Sphar 
%
  When all you have is a Swiss Army Knife, every problem looks like email. 
Peter da Silva 
%
  What's that word, it means you feel small and red, starts with an M? -- Peter 
  da Silva 
  Management. -- Simon Fraser 
%
  URLs point to web pages, not to people. 
  That's not true. The R stands for "Resource", and we know how much HR likes to 
  refer to people as "Resources" rather than "Human". Therefore, there should be 
  a URL to point to a person. 
  person://paul.tomblin/ 
  should return "Paul is currently sitting in his cubicle, bored out of his mind 
  and wishing he could strangle the people across from him who use their speaker 
  phones excessively". The word "cubicle" in that sentence could be a hyperlink 
  to a "cubicle://frontiercorp.com/180S.Clinton/2ndFloor/NE/187/" URL. 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  It seems that there are two different sorts of people: People who care about 
  the important stuff--like if a job gets done, and if it gets done well--and 
  clueless fucking morons who wouldn't know a job well done if it bit them on 
  the ass, and so think that "professionalism" is a better indicator of the 
  quality of work. 
Dave Brown 
%
  Same to you, dipshit -- Coredump 
  Clue: You've got the appropriate amount of hostility for the Monastery, 
  however you are metaphorically getting out of the safari jeep and kicking the 
  lions. Guess what that means, mtepahorically? 
  conclusion: 2 points for gusto, minus several million for good sense 
coonec 
%
  Here's your cable. We made it fifty feet long, just in case. In case what, in 
  case tectonic movement makes the serial ports farther apart? -- Carl Jacobs 
  You should ask them to wrap the cable multiple times around a car battery 
  "just to keep it stable". -- Mike Sphar 
%
  [...] I personally don't mind giving up a portion of my earnings to try to 
  keep said unadaptable people from starving in the street. -- Mike Sphar 
  Goodness, no, they should not be allowed to die on the streets. We have alleys 
  for that. -- Carl Jacobs 
%
  They kept dying but there were always more of them. It was like there was an 
  Elven prince making machine whose 'Name' setting was stuck on F*. -- John 
  Burnham 
  Look at the bright side: this machine was glob-driven. If it were 
  regexp-driven, it would make Elven princes with names like "FFF", "FFFFF", and 
  "FFFFFFFFF", and "". OTOH, it would be easier to compress these names 
  efficiently. -- Vadim Vygonets 
  "Some call me '^F[a-z\'-]+$', but I have many names". -- Malcolm Ray 
%
  THRUSH = the Technological Hierarchy for the Removal of Undesirables and the 
  Subjugation of Humanity -- Jim Hayter 
  As good a description of the Scary Devil Monastery as I've ever seen. -- Calle 
  Dybedahl 
%
  I love the way Microsoft follows standards. In much the same manner that fish 
  follow migrating caribou. 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  We were suffering from STR backlash. -- Mike Andrews 
  After a good meal of pasta and antipasta I imagine you would. -- Peter da 
  Silva 
%
  hooWHARF! Damn, that book stunk on ice. Guess I was right in avoiding the 
  others. "Pets and Children of Dune." "Dune, Meshugganah." "Dune: The 
  Unfortunate Continuation." -- Josh Brandt 
  "Chicken Soup for the Fremen Soul", "10 Stupid Things Harkonnen Do to Mess Up 
  Their Lives"... -- Mike Sphar 
  "Mentats for Dummies." -- Paul Tomblin 
%
  I couldn't get to ASR for a couple of nights and since then I've been coming 
  in spurts. -- Joe Thompson 
  The monastery isn't -that- good. -- Majdi Abbas 
%
  [Re : Star Office] 
  But, boy, that thing sure has pretensions towards being Microsoft Windows, 
  doesn't it? -- Dave Brown 
  It sure does. It's not just content to be a bloated, buggy and slow word 
  processor and office suite, it also has pretensions of being a window manager. 
  Yeah, you're right, it *does* think it's Microsoft. -- Paul Tomblin 
%
  So if I don't go to that site, they will not feed someone who they otherwise 
  would have? -- Jeffrey L. Bell 
  Yep. 
  And they'll show them a picture of your face, any web presences you might 
  have, and how you spend your leisure time. They'll give the starving person 
  your name and address and a bus ticket (and/or plane ticket) and a map and 
  send them off. One day, you'll be kicking back at home, playing Nintendo and 
  gorging yourself of sticky handfuls of Fiddle-Faddle, when the doorbell will 
  ring. You'll answer it and find, standing on your doorstep, a tiny waiflike 
  third-world child, all big eyes and protruding ribs, who will sniffle, shed a 
  single tear, say, "Why?" and expire in front of you. 
  So that's why you ought to go click. 
Josh Brandt 
%
  [Re : quantum physics] 
  I can't say I care one way or another. -- Kai Henningsen 
  That's just because nobody's measured you yet. -- Christian Bauernfeind 
%
  "Contestant number two, how do you set up a dial-up connection in Windows 95?" 

  "Call the systems administration people and tell them my machine is broken." 
  BZZZZZZZZT! "Oh, I'm sorry but that answer is so wrong that our systems people 
  have already found your address and will be visiting you personally tonight." 
Janet Rolsma 
%
  An ethernet hub with SCSI interface. All the subtlety of SCSI in a device that 
  until recently could be managed with a VT100. Now THAT's an image I don't 
  need. And someone, somewhere, out there, probably thinks it would be a really 
  neat idea. 
  "termination error on SCSI bus 5. All your networks have now gone down the 
  crapper". 
Bram Smits 
%
  I start to be a wandering sysadmin on the 10th Jan. -- John Burnham 
  Do you get your own bard as well? 

  "Bravely bold Sir Burnham 
  Brought forth from Camelot. 
  He was not afraid to die, 
  Oh, brave Sir Burnham! 
  He was not at all afraid to be killed in nasty ways. 
  Brave, brave, brave Sir Burnham. 

  He was not in the least bit scared to be mashed into a pulp. 
  Or to have his cables gouged out, and his MX records broken! 
  To have his domains split, and his /dev burned away 
  And his file systems all hacked and mangled, brave Sir Burnham. 

  His newsrc smashed in and his heart cut out, 
  And his relays removed and his routers unplugged, 
  And his hubs baked and his soul burnt off, 
  And his peni--" 
Mark Edwards 
%
  "A communications disruption can only mean one thing... Invasion." 
Lee Maguire, teaching us how to make people go away. 
%
  After all, everybody's got a water buffalo. -- Ben Coleman 
  in their machine room. -- Nix 
  with the candlestick. -- Christian Bauernfeind 
%
  Never meddle in the affairs of NT. It is slow to boot and quick to crash. 
Stephen Harris 
%
  BTW. Violence, rude language, excessive drinking, paganism. It's hard to find 
  children's books like that these days. 
Stig Morten Valstad 
%
  Speaking of Star Trek, I have just discovered the suckiest program in all 
  creation. Forget sucking golf balls through soda straws. Forget sucking 
  asteroids through pipettes. Hell, even sucking blue-giant stars through 
  millipore filters is nothing compared to the suckiness of Solomon IV and its 
  Time Card module. 
  This program could suck the entire space-time continuum through one of Brin's 
  "tuned strings". You need a cavitron and ten extra dimensions of space time to 
  describe its appalling suckiness. 
  This program requires you enter fields in a very specific order... NOT the 
  order laid out on the window, and if you mess up you have to exit it and start 
  over. 
  It chews up nearly 100M of VM. 
  It takes many minutes to exit and start up again if you made a mistake. 
  It's easy to make a mistake... every field has its own non-standard method of 
  entering data... for example instead of a pulldown you hit F3 and it brings up 
  a dialog box. 
  The dialog box has scroll bars that don't move, you click above or below them 
  to scroll the window they're attached to... but they don't actually move. If 
  you drag them they don't actually do anything. 
  Another field, a date, has a yellow background for some reason. 
  This one you enter by clicking on it and typing the new value. It doesn't 
  provide much feedback... if you got the value right it changes into something 
  similar to what you typed when it's checked it. 
  If you double-click in another field it changes the thing from a table to a 
  single entry for one time code. 
  You can't switch back, that I can tell. Note that in Windows double-clicking a 
  field is a very common way of bringing up a dialog box. 
  Aftre you entry any other fields, you can no longer change the date field. 
  The date field is always set to today, but you always need to set it to the 
  last day of the previous week. 
  If you don't set it to anything, it will set itself to the last day of the 
  next week. 
  To save your changes, you go to another window and select save. This other 
  window has a toolbar on it that includes "forward" and "back" icons... but 
  they don't do anything either. 
  This sounds like something Simon Travaglia would come up with to abuse lusers, 
  but apparently this really is what they think a good user interface is like. 
Peter da Silva 
%
  Maybe, but I think I'd like to propose Schwartz' Second Law (anybody who reads 
  or lurks on r.a.a.m should be able to find my First Law), namely: "The 
  consquences of any action will never be fully understood until after it's too 
  late to do anything about it." An obvious corollary: the sysadmin will be the 
  one who gets blamed for it, despite having warned them several times before. 
Eric The Read 
%
  [Re: Linda McCartney's backing vocal mike.] 
  I've never heard it, but it is apparently one of the more painful experiences 
  that a sentient being can undergo. Entire songs, written in the key of C, 
  being sung in the key of P sharp major with a demented ninth. 
Joe Bidgood 
%
  Ever read the little warning that comes with Lose9* and NT, with OS/2, and 
  with damn near anything else that has a Java compiler on it? 
  Very much like "Don't use this code for realtime control, for weapons systems, 
  or for anything else that may put life or limb at hazard. It isn't man-rated, 
  it isn't really thing-rated, and we don't claim that it's worth a good G*dDamn 
  for anything at all, at all." 
Mike Andrews 
%
  A *huge* proportion of people cannot make *correct and accurate* 
  generalisations of principles. They have to learn everything as if it's an 
  unrelated piece of crap, BECAUSE THEY ARE STUPID! PEOPLE ARE STUPID! YES, 
  THAT'S RIGHT, I'M SHOUTING NOW! AIEEEE!! PEOPLE ARE STUPID! 
Thorfinn 
%
  "New for Linux: SoftCondom. Because with a GUI named Explorer, you never know 
  where NT's been." 
Joe Thompson 
%
  "The way NT mounts filesystems is something I'd expect to find in a barnyard 
  or on a stock-breeding farm." 
Mike Andrews 
%
  Every time you apply the LART, you give some poor luser a chance to redeem 
  itself and RTFM nect time. -- Infinitas 
  Oh. You didn't apply the LART hard enough. 
  They get to RTFM next time around the Wheel Of Reincarnation, if you do it 
  right. :) 
Thorf 
%
  I trust Microsoft. 
  I trust them to be spectacularly unable to get anything right, including and 
  especially hard things like large-scale industrial espionage. Sure, they'll 
  make clownish, clumsy stabs at it and fail in predictable, amusing and 
  embarassing ways, and then do it all over again. And their victi^H^H users 
  will not only forgive them but spend a lot of energy making up excuses for 
  them. 
henke 
%
  The only way to convince some people that HTML is about content, not style is 
  with a 2x4 <PLANK>. 
Geoff. Lane 
%
  Fsck, either way I'm screwed. -- petro 
  Now *that* is the Sysadmin's motto. -- Peter da Silva 
%

  "You are trapped in a maze of screens and ssh sessions all alike." 
  "It is dark, and you are likely to log off the wrong account." 
Nep. 
%
  One doesn't deal with SAP. SAP deals with you. _Harshly_. 
  There's this one project that I'm involved with at a "Lawks a Lordy, that's 
  going to set my bottom on fire" level which will ultimately involve SAP 
  somewhere. 
  I've got the twitching under control, but loud noises still have me diving for 
  cover. 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  I find Trinitron is worth an extra 2" in size at least. -- Peter da Silva 
  While I agree that Trinitron is valuable, I am a bit worried about the 
  currency you payed in... -- Felix 
%

  For their next act, they'll no doubt be buying a firewall running under NT, 
  which makes about as much sense as building a prison out of meringue. 
-:Tanuki:- 
%
  Not only do I buy the beer, but I also have the root password. There's always 
  enough Guinness for me. 
Mike Sphar 
%
  You can lead an idiot to knowledge but you cannot make him think. 
  You can, however, rectally insert the information, printed on stone tablets, 
  using a sharpened poker. 
Nicolai 
%
  Remember - if all you have is an axe, every problem looks like hours of fun. 
Frossie 
%
  I don't know, I think the shiny metal looks more menacing than wood. Wood just 
  seems to natural and...woody. Metal is cold and hard like a BOFH's heart. 
Mike Sphar 
%
  And it's 1, 2, 3, what are we booting for? 
  Don't ask me I don't give a damn 
  Buy me a gig of RAM 
  And it's 5, 6, 7, bend over for Billy Gates, 
  We-ell there ain't no time to learn vi, 
  Whoopee! We'll all go to Fry's! 
Ben 
%
  For is it not written, wheresoever two or three are gathered together, yeay 
  they will perform the Parrot Sketch. 
Rob 
%
  [Microsoft Vaccine 2000 is configuring your immune system. This may take a few 
  minutes. If your body stops responding for a long time and there is no brain 
  activity please die. Setup will continue after you are reborn.] 
Buzh 
%
  Ban cars and what you end up with are walk-by shootings. With water pistols. 
  Pretty messy, especially when the protagonists are using drench guns[0]. 
  Lecturers will come into the room wondering why the front row of desks is 
  flooded. The local supermarket will sell out of its entire stock of weapons in 
  a single afternoon, after which a continuing arms race will lead to people 
  hauling backpack water tanks around with them. Others will be seen wandering 
  down corridors looking as though they'd been caught in a heavy thunderstorm... 
  but it's a sunny day. Noone will dare enter a room without doing a 
  terminator-style survey of the place[1]. This will lead to a general collapse 
  of civilisation and worldwide anarchy, the extinction of the human race, and 
  the evolution of sentient frogs to replace them. 
  Better to stick with drive-by killings. 
Peter 
%
  I can offer you some industrial-strength Beef, Egg and Onion pies; served with 
  a healthy amount of baked beans, if that doesn't get your emissions of 
  Eggdimethyl Beansoxide up to a level which constitutes a violation of the 
  Geneva Convention on chemical warfare, i don't know what will. 
-:Tanuki:- 
%
  Congratulations. You're a BOFH. This means you are a clued and discerning 
  individual. However you must realise that a certain etiquette applies to your 
  position. Read on for advice to help you win friends and influence people. The 
  *right* friends and people. 
  LANGUAGE: You should only call someone a 'Bastard' if they are deserving of 
  this honorific. Under no circumstances should the word be applied to someone 
  who is neither ruthless nor clued. It *is* appropriate to encourage budding 
  instances of this behaviour with the term of endearment "BOFHlet". 
  TABLE MANNERS: Do not use your Leatherman to cut your food. A simple knife 
  will suffice, and preserve the blade for better things. When entertaining, 
  always offer caffeine and/or alcohol to visiting BOFHs. Under no circumstances 
  should you mix BOFHs and lusers in the same social invitation; it distresses 
  your BOFH guests and the stains are difficult to get out of most carpet 
  fabrics. 
  TIMING: Punctuality, as understood by the less educated population to mean 
  adherence to a time-measuring-device, is not required by the BOFH, though it 
  is not an outright faux pas to indulge in it if you are so inclined. However 
  an exemplary BOFH will show great feats of event-driven timing such as walking 
  into a dead computer room before the UPS runs out, or logging on in the middle 
  of the night moments before a mission-critical disk fills up. You should also 
  show promptness in swiftly LARTing a luser as an example to others, though 
  some delay for comic timing is widely tolerated. 
  LARTS: When considering items to use as a LART, there are two golden rules. 
  Firstly, it has to be as severe as the transgression merits *at the very 
  least*. Secondly, you should be attentive to innocent third parties. In 
  particular, the discharge of thermonuclear and biochemical weapons is severely 
  frowned upon in the near proximity of clued individuals. In general this means 
  that you are unlikely to be able to use one politely outside the general 
  vicinity of Redmond. Also, it is not done to do leave body parts in the office 
  trash for the cleaning staff to collect unless they have actively displeased 
  you. 
Frossie 
%
  If practical QCs ever become reality, the one thing we can be sure of is that 
  they'll suck. But they'll suck in multiple universes simultaneously, which is 
  probably a first. -- Malcolm Ray 
  Nah, I had a girl friend who could do that... -- petro 
%
  Al Gore invented the Internet, Bill Gates delpoyed it. That's their respective
  stories, anyways. -- Firebeard 

  delpoyment: the art of defining, then implementing the ugliest deviant 
  interpretation of an already established standard. -- Peter N. M. Hansteen 
%
  Keep on about Scotch again, and I'll be forced to tell my Boston/Logan 
  Airport/Car Rental story, and that'll get Joe Thompson all wadded up, and 
  he'll complain, and things will get really ugly. 
  Then some yahoo who forgot to keep up with the thread and who fails to realise 
  that it's dead will mention how he is rather fond of Macallan 18 over ice, and 
  after the screams of outrage die down, then the whole discussion of the 
  virtues of adding water/not adding water to Scotch will begin, and everyone 
  will agree that whether or not you like water in your scotch, it should at 
  least be in liquid form, and then someone will probably mention purity of 
  chocolate, and one of the Yurpean Monks will brag about having a shop right 
  across the street which sells bars that are 99.44% pure, and everyone will 
  point out that, in fact, he's really been eating Ivory Soap, and no one will 
  agree on anything except that American chocolate sucks and...and...we don't 
  really need that. 
  So enough with the Scotch already. 
Carl Jacobs 
%
  I've always maintained that no software should be released that can't 
  withstand three hours of enthusiastic yet undirected pounding-on by a typical 
  five-year-old. -- Joe Thompson 
  You've just described Microsoft's entire development process. -- Malcolm Ray 
%
  I'm not sure that the ability to create routing diagrams similar to pretzels 
  with mad cow disease is actually a marketable skill. 
Steve Levin 
%
  The ability to watch M*A*S*H on demand justified purchasing a VCR for myself. 
  That show taught me a lot of useful things; for example, if one's skills are 
  sufficiently in demand, one can wear a bathrobe to work, and generally have 
  one's eccentricities tolerated. 
Gus 
%
  cat Dimensions | /dev/blackhole > Dimensions.bz -- Robert Blake 
  Wow. Rootkit for Universes. -- Peter da Silva 
  Yes, but Ghod help you if you ctrl-alt-del while using it. . . . -- Keith A. 
  Glass 
%
  In a previous article, djc@cc.umanitoba.ca (D. Joseph Creighton) said: >In the 
  last exciting episode, Chad Matsalla wrote: maybe someday they will find a way 
  to remotely administer cattle. -- Chad Matsalla 
  They're called Collies. Of course, distance is limited to line-of-sight or 
  hearing range. -- D. Joseph Creighton 
  Now I'm trying to picture Wide Area Border Collies. Thanks. -- Paul Tomblin 
  Well then I am not sure what your idea of "remote" is. And if I am going to 
  use a dog in systems administration it will be part of a pack of other wild 
  dogs. And herding will be the last thing they are trained to do. -- Chad 
  Matsalla 
%
  Usenet should require licenses; licenses that can be revoked. 
Abigail 
%
  The most exciting phrase to hear in science, the one that heralds new 
  discoveries, is not "Eureka!" (I found it!) but "That's funny ..." 
Isaac Asimov 
%
  You are in a twisty maze of lusers all alike. -- Paul Martin 
  While, on the surface, this appears to be true. In actual fact, when examined 
  closely, each and every luser is uniquely and serially stupid. -- Geoff. Lane 
%
  Then the home office "took control of the situation". That consisted of 
  demanding the root password, and then contacting me at least once every three 
  hours until 0100 last night. Sometimes they paged me. Sometimes they called me 
  at home. After I unplugged my phone from the wall and took the battery out of 
  my pager, my boss showed up at my front door. -- Jack Twilley 
  This situation almost sounds fun to me. I would take great joy in sitting in 
  the living room happily ignoring said boss knocking on my door. I'd probably 
  even turn up the TV and make loud "whooza fuzzy kitty den? You are, aren't 
  you?" noises at my cat. -- Mike Sphar 
%
  I used to herd dairy cows. Now I herd lusers. Apart from the isolation, I 
  think I preferred the cows. They were better conversation, easier to milk, and 
  if they annoyed me enough, I could shoot them and eat them. 
Rodger Donaldson 
%
  Sigh. Anyone want an irritable, manic-depressive sysadmin ? -- John 
  I'll think about it. Do you think I should keep a backup for the one I already 
  have? -- Bernard Peek 
  No. You run them both in a cluster environment, so they can share the 
  irritability. Of course, having two sysadmin's you naturally get twice the 
  irritability than before. If one sysadmin goes down[0] then the other one 
  becomes twice as irritable to cope. 
  Benefits in this environment allow one sysadmin to go offline for maintenance 
  (eg beer!) without major impact. Unfortunately most clusters of this type are 
  poorly configured and one sysadmin going offline generally causes the other to 
  go offline as well. 
Stephen 
%
  I think if Cael approached me, arms flaming, with his usual scary-looking 
  expression, not only would I stop dancing, I'd likely start running very fast. 

  You just don't mess with a man whose arms are on fire. 
Joe 
%
  In my opinion, the press covers every country.
  In the veterinary sense. 
Brian 
%
  Damn, squid must have satisfied my reloads from cache. -- Peter da Silva 
  That sounds so very much nastier than it is. -- adam 
%
  Except that his file won't have the pretty little thumbnail that he gets on 
  the Mac. He'll get the dogeared-piece-of-paper icon on that file, and sit 
  there waving his flippers like a thalidomide baby until you show him that yes, 
  Photoshop will still open the file. 
Charles Gimon 
%
  Eh? Linux is luserproof? What kind of "proper" set up is that, ripping out all 
  removable media devices and ethernet, freezing the hard drive spindle, 
  encasing it in concrete and dropping it off a pier? 
Greg Andrews 
%
  To me it sounds like a flock of ducks trying to out-honk a Mac Truck, but 
  getting cut short tragically as they all fly into the grill work of the truck. 
  But that's just me. 
Paul Tomblin, about the system beep on the Alpha UDB. 
%
  Embrace your inner cynicism. Delight in the joy of knowing, with complete 
  certainty, that the world is filled with idiots, losers, and all other 
  assorted manner of higher life forms, and that a great many of of them trying 
  their damndest to win the competition for "Species Least Likely To Be Useful". 
  I figure, they'll probably lose that competition too, proving once again that 
  the cockroach is mightier than the "man". 
Jeff Gostin 
%
  What is the sound of one backpack EMP weapon discharging? -- Joe Thompson 
  "Clickety-click" -- Charles Cazabon 
%
  "Fear leads to anger. Anger leads to hate. Hate leads to using Windows NT for 
  mission-critical applications."
  -- What Yoda *meant* to say 
Devin L. Ganger 
%
  Yes, Virginia, there is a Santa Claus. He wears red to hide the bloodstains, 
  and he brings fscked disks to bad sysadmins. That means all of us, according 
  to Santa Claus. 
Mike Andrews 
%
  When I write non-quick-and-dirty stuff aimed at sysadmins, I'll include the 
  standard blah about typographical conventions, but if I have to include a 
  warning that running a command with an argument list which bears *no* 
  *relation* to the argument list shown cannot be expected to have the same 
  effect, it's time for a reality check. 
Malcolm Ray 
%
  "Each McSploit meal comes with your choice of a McPortscan burger or Chicken 
  McNukets and a root-sized fries and drink. And with each McSploit meal, you'll 
  get one of these four l33t toys: 
    hax0rspeak decoder ring - be the kradest one on your block! 
    Miniature Kipling backpack 
    WM.McTrojan.A 
    Serial Numberz for unlocking expensive commercial software (That is, 
    software which plays McDonalds commercials) 
  Own all four today!" 
Matthew Sachs 
%
  I live in fear of the day that the Hoopsnakes hybridize with the common 
  Ethernet Patchsnake[1]. Imagine the sheer hell of it: colonies of them 
  becoming established in the warm, dark recesses of wiring-closets, and 
  concealing themselves in boxes with routers, switches and the like. 
  -- Tanuki 
  Hm, that might explain why the PFYs keep on disappearing after I send them off 
  to work in the comms riser on the 49th floor. 
  -- Lionel Lauer 
%
  "Oh, I would LART five hundred times, and I would LART five hundred more/ Just 
  to be the man who LARTs a thousand, times to kill them by the score..." 
Joe Thompson 
%
  Yes, I did programmatically remove all instances of shit like: 
/*FF*/
/*** hey emacs this is C source ***/
/*@@ 3l33t-source-code-printer-program-opts: -foo -bar -qux @@*/

/***********************************
** RESIZE EDITOR WINDOW TO THIS BIG------------------------------------------------->
***********************************/

  from the source tree and if I find them back there I will _personally_ take 
  great pleasure in gouging out your eyes and stuffing the bleeding sockets with 
  fire ants and broken glass. 
henke 
%
  Two of my imaginary friends reproduced once ... with negative results. 
Ben (float) 
%
  I can see it now: We can turn sysadminness into a big business. A line of cute 
  sysadmin toys-My Little Lionel, My Little Simon. An especially My Little 
  Frossie, complete with the little heart in the center. Sure, puke now, but 
  wait til you count the $$$. Then comes A cute sysadmin cartoon, Admin Babies. 
  "Dear me, baby Thorfy, we gotta go boot the 3b2 frontend to that convex over 
  there." "Oh no, Mr. Meanyhead the Luser has filled his quota up again". 
  Sysadmin trading cards: "Here we have the Evi Nemeth Special Edition, back 
  when she was still back at Waterloo, in the minors"[1]. A cute little platform 
  game where you have to navigate your sysadmin through wiring closets, machine 
  rooms and the like, collecting the magic scsi terminators. [2] 
Matthew Crosby 
%
  One day, a student asked a master, "Master, there is conflict between the 
  suits and the sysadmins. Which group has the Zen nature, and which group is 
  grieviously disturbing the stillness of the Tao?" 
  And the master said nothing, but installed an operating system. And the 
  student was enlightened. 
Anthony DeBoer 
%
  "We are either doing something, or we are not. 'Talking about' is a subset of 
  'not'." 
%
  This sounds like the meaningless story an executive mailed out the other day: 
  $PERSON was walking through a construction site, and asked the first worker he 
  saw what he was doing. The worker responded "I'm mixing cement". $PERSON then 
  walked to second worker and asked same question, to which the second worker 
  responded "I'm laying bricks". $PERSON then asks same question of a third 
  worker who responds proudly "I'm building a cathedral!" 
  Said executive then goes on to talk about how he's looking for 
  "cathedral-builders" for his company, blah blah blah blah. 
  All I could think was: "Hey, if I'm working at a construction site, and some 
  idjit walks up and asks what I'm *doing", I will answer 'Pouring cement, 
  dipshit, what does it look like I'm doing?'" 
Mike Sphar 
%
  When people ask me what my religion is, I say either "Frisbeetarianism" which 
  satisfies them if they're not listening closely, or "I'm trying to make up my 
  mind between the Greek and Babylonian chaos goddesses, do you think Eris or 
  Mummu has dishier priestesses?" 
  Though now I'm a minister I should probably take that question more seriously. 

Peter da Silva 
%
  First time I've gotten a programming job that required a drug test. I was 
  worried they were going to say "you don't have enough LSD in your system to do 
  Unix programming". 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  A distributed system is one in which the failure of a computer you didn't even 
  know existed can render your own computer unusable. 
Leslie Lamport 
%
  A disturbance of sysadmins. Because if we are, you will be. 
Joe Thompson 
%
  A Zen of SysAdmins 
  We are at one with our work. If you disturb our work, our foot will be at one 
  with your ass. Sadly, you won't be at One with anything thereafter. You'll be 
  in lots of little pieces we call Bits, some of which are at One with 
  themselves, and others, which are at Zero with themselves, but none of which 
  will be At One with you. 
J. Gostin 
%
  Unfortunately, our Bright Young PFY will no longer be assisting with 
  expeditions downtown, as he has been dubbed the Telecom Destruction Bunny and 
  banned from taking his aura anywhere near anything major. 
Anthony DeBoer 
%
  I mean, we all self-LART to varying degrees on occasion. What sets us apart 
  from the lusers is that we can pull ourselves out of the nosedive. 
Mike Sphar 
%
  ... (Has Microsoft lost its Buddha nature?) -- Ingvar Mattsson 
  Someone really ought to explain to them that the Buddha nature consists of 
  more than being obese and just sitting there. 
Anthony DeBoer 
%
  I'm locked in a maze of little projects, all of which suck. 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  "I'm not lean and mean, I'm surly and anorexic". 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  Hacksaws and band saws and cleavers and sharp knives,
  After the lusers have given up their lives,
  BOFHen need ways, to separate parts,
  Why not use some of our favorite LARTs? 
  Dynamite, TNT, nitro and tac-nukes,
  Those are too harsh on the poor little dumb pukes.
  They hurt machines and they don't leave much meat,
  If we use them, then what are we to eat? 
  When the LARTs fall, when the fools die, when I'm feeling glad,
  I just cut them up (not across), and haul them to my pad. 
Dave Aronson 
%
  "Redirection is hard." -- Web-Luser Barbie -- flaps 
  "Forging headers is tough!" --Spammer Barbie -- Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%

  I quite often tell my SO to iron my shirts, make dinner, do the cleaning, 
  etc... but only because I like to hear her laugh. 
manc0046 
%
  [Re: The Four Horsemen] 
  Don't you mean 
    "The Internet is down." meaning "I accidentally took my printer off line" 
    "The Internet is down." meaning "I fiddled with my registry and now my 
    computer won't boot" 
    "The Internet is down." meaning "I forgot my password" and 
    "The Internet is down." meaning "My favourite porn site isn't responding" 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  And besides, given raw postscript in web pages, for every one person who 
  writes a clever bit of code, there would be ten thousand clicking the "Save as 
  Postscript for Extra Pretty Fonts!" button in GUI-Visual-Bloat Web Designer, 
  by Obesityware, pushing the average page size into the multi-megabyte range. 
  Yup. There's a feature, all right. 
Mark Jeffcoat 
%
  From empirical experience, your Exchange admin needs to put down the crack 
  pipe and open a window to disperse the fumes. 
Joe Thompson 
%
  Cardiac Arrest(tm) Snack Cakes! Tossed Death Cookies(r)! And Little Debbie(r) 
  Fatal Attraction Pies(tm)![0] 
  [0] As if everything by Little Debbie isn't a fatal attraction. She is not 
  your friend, she is a lying deceitful bitch who wants to give you a heart 
  attack. But DAMN, she's irresistable. 
Mark Hughes 
%
  These girls is crafty & evil beasties. They twist & turn like... like... 
  twisty, turny things. -- Lionel Lauer 
  "Passages", Lionel, "passages". -- Thorfy 
  Passages and girls in a comparison? Does someone have a barge-pole I can 
  absolutely not touch this one with? -- Joe Thompson 
  passages:girls::bargepoles:NO CARRIER -- Ben (float) 
%

  I see an Urgent Need(tm) for a new unit of measurement, to distinguish the 
  amount of something that will kill half the sample population from the amount 
  that will simply make half of them _want_ to die. UDNAD50 anyone? 
  The UDNAD50 of tequila is around half a bottle. The UDNAD50 of crappy C code 
  is about 300 lines. Imacs, damn near one. 
  A closely related unit is the LARTD50, which is the dose of something that 
  will inspire half the sample population to make the perpetrator want to die. 
henke 
%
  I think that sick people in Ankh-Morpork generally go to a vet. It's generally 
  a better bet. There's more pressure on a vet to get it right. People say "it 
  was god's will" when granny dies, but they get *angry* when they lose a cow. 
Terry Pratchett 
%
  That sounds like exactly the right way Microsoft would do it: 
    With UDP, your packets will almost certainly get there unmangled. But you'll 
    never know. 
    With TCP, your message will be corrupt and interrupted for no apparent 
    reason. Attempts to correct errors will cause your disconnection. When you 
    attempt to reconnect, the TCP/IP unstack will pretend not to hear. 
  (I'm picturing Windows NT jamming a network backbone going "la la la la I 
  can't hear you la la la la la".) 
Graham Reed 
%
  They used to advertise it claiming, "If you've eaten a banana and drank some 
  milk you've had everything in n*sweet." 
  My reply was, "You've also had everything in potassium cyanide. So what?" 
Joe Zeff 
%
  <fantasy mode> 
  "Sir, Sir! I've deleted all my files" 
  "Yes my child, and pray tell me how" 
  "I wanted to delete directories fred1 and fred2 but I typed rm -rf fred * when 
  should have typed rm -rf fred*" 
  "Ah ha, and what have you learnt" 
  "To beware of powerful file name globbing facilities that my shell provides 
  for my careful use." 
  "Yes my child, you have learnt a painful lession. Now you must learn how to 
  recover files from one of the many, multiply redundent backup tapes you have 
  carefully written every evening ever since you were granted a powerful 
  personal workstation." 
  "Master, I'm eager to learn!" 
  </fantasy mode> 
Geoff. Lane 
%
  No lusers were harmed in the creation of this usenet article. 
  AND I WANT TO KNOW WHY NOT! 
Geoff. Lane 
%
  life suddenly made much more sense, the day i fully grokked that people are 
  stupid. 
Frank Sweetser 
%
  [Re: Anakin building C3PO out of spare parts for free] 
  What I wanna know is where he got the language databases for the over six 
  million forms of communication. Building a droid doesn't look too hard, based 
  on evidence. Populating that droid with knowledge that is likely exceedingly 
  expensive is not a walk in the park. 
  -- Eric The Read 
  alt.binaries.warez.protocol-droids.c3 
  This also explains what tempted him to his first steps toward the "dark side." 

  It's only a very short step from that to Palpatine seeing a post along the 
  lines of: "CA|\| NE1 0N Th]5 BB0ARD T3Ll M3 H0w 2 GeT KeWL S]Th 
  P0WeRZ!?!?!?!??!?" 
  The rest is, well, a couple more overly-hyped ILM graphics demos. 
  -- henke 
%
  The Imperial Vendor or Contractor probably told them that droid armies don'T 
  need redundant command centers, nor any kind of high availability ... you're 
  supposed to buy several, and cluster them. 
  -- void 
  Redundant Array of Inexpensive Droids? 
  It's possible there had been armed autonomous droids at some point in the 
  past, and one can almost imagine past issues of that galaxy's Risks Digest. 
  Perhaps after such experiences, they considered it wisest that autonomous 
  droids have nothing stronger than R2D2's bugzapper. 
  -- Anthony DeBoer 
%
  Ben, being able to utter the words "cryogenically cooled eyeballs" on Usenet 
  was a form of recovery. Don't try to take that away from me or I might get 
  crotchety and go Tomblinate[1] you. 
  [1] I've always been of the opinion that one's fellow sysadmins should be 
  treated with the politeness due a group of well-armed individuals[2], but 
  apparently not all of us are that hesitant. 
  [2] The wise man does not tell a person with a gun to go check his filesystems 
  for consistency. 
Anthony DeBoer 
%
  That's why there's no toilets on the Enterprise. They just beam it straight 
  into the mass tanks from your body, much more efficient. 
  -- Peter da Silva 
  This gives new insight into why the engineering crew works so hard to get the 
  system back online when the transporters go down. 
  -- Ansel 
%
  In every given certification course at least one student must decide that each 
  person in the class came n-thousand miles to hear his/her own questionable 
  "expertise" delivered unprompted and continued ad nauseum much to the dismay 
  of the rest of the class. 
Chad Matsalla 
%
  I'm still pondering whether i should pre-emptively register "I can't believe 
  it's not Jesus" as a name for a low-calorie communion wafer, so i get in there 
  before the church... 
Tanuki 
%
  I try to explain, but he goes into the back room and gets this wizened old guy 
  with a pocket protector and a nametag that read "Senior Engineer." 
  -- Jack Twilley 
  His mom really must have hated him. 
  -- Charles Cazabon 
%
  I may be a Bastard, but I never ever ever argue with flight crew. They just 
  don't have a sense of humor about that sort of thing. 
  If the stewardess tells me NT is a far more stable and reliable OS than UNIX, 
  I'll nod politely and say "Is it really? How nice." 
  Of course, I'll rant about what a luser she is later, but as long as we're on 
  the plane, she gets to be uid zero. 
Mike Sphar 
%
  Luserspotting. 
  Choose Windows. Choose a PC. Choose a fucking big hard disk and a Pentium III 
  to run Internet Explorer and mIrc. Choose HTML email, and viruses... Melissa, 
  Wm.Concept, ExploreZip. Choose sitting in that chair watching mind-numbing 
  soulless web-pages, stuffing fucking virus-infected plugins into your browser. 
  Choose porn, rotting away at the end of it all, pishing away your last on a 
  miserable dialup, staring at fat whores, nothing but an embarassment to the 
  people who built the net. 
  Choose Linux. Choose a PC. Choose a fucking big hard disk and a Pentium III to 
  run Enlightenment and KDE. Choose warez, set up a webserver, smurf other 
  lusers who diss you on IRC. Choose sitting in that char creating mind-numbing 
  soulless web pages, stuffing them with blink and frames and javascript and 
  virus-infected plugins. Choose porn, rotting away at the end of it all, 
  pishing away your last on a miserable dialup, staring at fat whores, nothing 
  but an embarassment to the people who built the net. 
  Doesn't matter what a luser chooses, they're still a luser. 
Peter da Silva 
%
  Remember to chant "Pie Jesu domine, dona eis requiem" whenever you do that. 
  -- Peter Gutmann 
  I can't do that, Peter. I have several old texts in my office (bound with 
  animal skin, and inked with blood), and every time I attempt to chant any sort 
  of Latin[0] the walls begin to bleed, and my Arrowhead Mountain Spring Water 
  bottle tells me it's going to kill me with my flathead screwdriver. 
  -- Stephen S. Edwards II 
%
  You should come to Germany to see what milk is supposed to taste like. Or, 
  even better, a farmer in Denmark or Ireland. 
  -- Felix von Leitner 
  Maybe it's just me, but I really don't care to know what a farmer in Denmark 
  or Ireland tastes like. -- Andy Wagliardo 
%
  If you tell them, they never listen. If they listen, they never learn. If they 
  learn, they never remember. If they remember, they never obey. 
Markus 
%
  "Usenet: wisdom in homeopathic doses." 
Paul Martin 
%
  Someone else: Snots is a lot more than just an email program...
  Me: ... it's a complete denial-of-service attack in one package. 
Peter Gutmann 
%
  That's when you must acquire the skill to fart at whim... doing so will 
  protect the Holy Personal Space. 
Stephen S. Edwards II 
%
  I'm still waiting for the marketing slogan: 
  Retry Reboot Reinstall Reformat Redhat 
  -- Alan 
  Around here, we refer to that as "Service Pack 6.0" 
  -- Paul Tomblin 
%
  "Yeah, I know. It was a long time ago and I was a lot more optimistic then." 
  "And besides, the CNAME is dead." 
Mike Sphar and Greg Andrews 
%
  Hey, you're right. I don't want to call a destructor on my objects, I want to 
  call a *destroyer*. Gozer has come for your memory, little PersistentNode! 
Joel Gluth 
%
  "Coed Naked Tech Support: You're Never Alone When You're On The Phone." 
The motto at loyola.edu's helpdesk 
%
  But if it is a differential SCSI chain, you need two goats, one black and one 
  white, and two ceremonies: kill the black goat at high noon and the white one 
  at midnight. Same silver knife for both, of course. 
  Otherwise, the chain will be unbalanced and things just get worse from there 
  as all the drives do the "washing machine dance".... 
  Self-terminating devices merely need to be left with sufficient livestock and 
  they'll take care of the rest. 
Graham Reed 
%
  Ah, young webmaster... 
  java leads to shockwave. 
  Shockwave leads to realaudio.
  And realaudio leads to suffering.

Peter da Silva 
%
  [Re: using a plunger to take out dents]
  Yeah, *that'd* sound good in the convenience store: "One toilet plunger and a 
  gallon of vaseline to go." 
Lars Balker Rasmussen 
%
  [Re: SETI@home]
  That would be on the "Let's look for intelligence out there, because there's 
  none here" principle? 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  If USENET is anarchy, IRC is a paranoid schizophrenic after 6 days on speed. 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  Disney's _The Diary Of Anne Frank_, starring the voice of Ani DeFranco as the 
  title character, and Arnold Schwartenegger as the voice of Hans Von 
  Gruppenficher, the handsome young SS Commando who captures her heart. 
  -- Christian Wagner 
  Where's the talking animal? -- Shalon Wood 
  My guess would be on talking mice. Perhaps in a bit of cross-promoting, they 
  could have the talking mice from _Cinderella_. Failing that, the talking 
  fixtures from _Beauty & The Beast_ probably need more work.
  Now that I think about it, a large, lovable police dog that finds the family 
  but refuses to signal its masters after the young heroine smiles at it from a 
  hiding place would probably work as well. 
  I'm not going to think about this anymore. 
  -- Gus 
%
  Nanau taught me the Second Clue. If you make a decision under pressure, and 
  someone who's never been in the same position decides at leisure to criticise 
  without being polite and asking questions, make sure that the person 
  understands the absolute inappropriateness of this as hard as possible. If 
  someone with more technical experience wants to suggest how you should handle 
  it next time, that's okay fine. 
Rebecca Ore 
%
  The BOFH's First Axiom : There are no inappropriate means for achieving the 
  goal of getting questions or silence. 
Named by Mike Andrews, defined by Rebecca Ore 
%
  Some are born to Enlightenment, some achieve Enlightenment, and others have 
  Enlightenment larted upon them. 
Greg 
%
  The screaming should be done by the luser - until the BOFH applies 
  $LART_of_choice in a terminal way to stop the screaming. After all - whining 
  and screaming are some of the few things lusers are good at [1] ... 
  [1] Breaking stuff by ''changing nothing'', ''touching nothing'' or even 
  'doing nothing'' and annoying the hard working BOFH are some others ... 
als 
%
  The pages were fairly well bound. The cover was not. It looked as though the 
  binder had sewn and glued the pages, let it dry, and then blown his nose on 
  the spine and installed the cover. 
Ansel 
%
  ``Turn off your targeting computer, Luke. Software sucks. Hardware sucks. You 
  have a better chance of making this shot by guessing.'' 
  ``Now we're going to run through the woods. Well, not quite. You're going to 
  put me in a backback and run through the woods carrying me. Why? *You're* the 
  PFY.'' 
  -- Rodger Donaldson
%

  As one notices, Ben has been around the block far too many times. He has the 
  BOFH nature. Luke, OTOH, goes for this crap hook, line, and sinker. He has the 
  PFY nature. 
  -- Anthony DeBoer 
  By RotJ, of course, Luke also has BOFH nature. Note how he calmly goes to the 
  HR department^W^W^WJabba's lair. Note how he calmly asks for his friends back. 
  Note how he calmly annihilates all about him when he doesn't get what he 
  wants. 
  Still, Jedi mind tricks would be great for BOFHen facing internal audits: 
  ``These E10000s aren't the budget overruns you're looking for.'' 
  -- Rodger Donaldson 
%
  BTW, I thank all the denizens for their fairly exemplary politeness to one 
  another over the past weeks. I've been watching the 
  ORBS/anti-ORBS/RBL/anti-RBL flamefests on nanae, and it has been ... well, the 
  culinary equivalent is just about everyone spraying just about everyone else 
  with pureed Habanero peppers. Copiously. 
Mike Andrews 
%
  So the canonical metasyntactic syllables are foo, bar, baz, gzork, and zot? I 
  always wondered what came after baz. 
  -- Charles Cazabon 
  Nono: bletch before baz, except after frob. 
  -- Malcolm Ray 
%
  A heisenbug jumps around the system; if you look at it, it disappears only to 
  manifest in a seemingly totally unrelated place. 
  A schroedinbug is one where the bug exists for years, and theoretically would 
  prevent the program from working, but because no one is aware of it it 
  doesn't. However, eventually somebody looks at the code and goes "That 
  couldn't *possibly* work!" at which point, it ceases to. Schroedinbugs are an 
  inverse case of the Hundredth Monkey problem. 
  -- Joe Thompson 
  Bohr Bug: A repeatable bug; one that manifests reliably under a possibly 
  unknown but well-defined set of conditions. 
  Mandelbug: A bug whose underlying causes are so complex and obscure as to make
  its behavior appear chaotic or even non-deterministic. This term implies that 
  the speaker thinks it is a Bohr bug, rather than a heisenbug. 
  -- David Jacoby (quoting the Jargon File) 
%
  [Re : training lusers like one trains a bonsai tree] 
  Hmmm.. nice idea.. bury them up to their knees in mud, wrap them round with 
  stiff wire, twist them into contorted shapes, chop bits off them at regular 
  intervals, leave them where they are for forty years or so with minimal 
  feeding, sell them for vast amounts of money.. there must be a snag in this 
  somewhere.. why can't I see it? 
Gid 
%
  In German "invent-a-new-word-where-a-perfectly-good-one-already-exists" is 
  probably a word. 
Peter da Silva 
%
  You know, I have dealt with some immensely stupid fucking wastes of skin, but 
  these people astound me with their stupidity! Really!... These sacks of shit 
  in expensive suits make a short bus full of retards look like a fucking 
  physicist's convention! 
Stephen S. Edwards II 
%
  [on "In God We Trust"] 
  Don't ask *me* how you set the trust-level of a god. 
  -- Par Leijonhufvud 
  At a PGP key signing party. 
  -- Peter da Silva 
%
  "This UI has been brought to you by the letters 'S' and 'K', and the runlevel 
  3." 
Greg Andrews 
%
  Funny, the Canadian scouting organization has "religion in my life" badges 
  with either an Alpha and Omega, a Menorah, a Crescent, and possibly other 
  religous symbols that I haven't encountered yet. 
  -- Paul Tomblin 
  Watch out for the one with tentacles. 
  -- Malcolm Ray 
%
  Me and the caller ID window have a very positive working relationship. 
Mike Sphar 
%
  BOFHs have no nation. 
  -- Mark 'Kamikaze' Hughes 
  We have the nation "Clue", with it's independant yet under governance 
  territory "Root". Both have a nice (pron. "vicious") border patrol with at 
  least some standards for getting into the joint. 
  -- Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  [Re: "Da Bomb" hot sauce] 
  This stuff will not only take the paint off a battleship, it'll also hunt down 
  the painter and hir family, murder them, desecrate the bodies, and proceed to 
  have its way with the family pet. 
Mark C. Langston 
%
  The main difference between lusers & budgies is that it's standard practice to
  keep one's budgie in a cage. I feel that there is a lesson here for all of us.

Lionel Lauer 
%
  Perl isn't really a swiss army knife. That's more like C. Perl is a large, 
  metallic toolbox containing: 
  -a complete set of box-end wrenches in metric and imperial, except 10mm and 
  3/8"
  -a selection of five machinists' hammers
  -one regular construction hammer
  -ten- and twelve-pound sledgehammers
  -complete set of Robertson screwdrivers
  -and an infinite length of duct tape 
Charles Cazabon 
%
  The difference between math and physics is the difference between masturbation
  and sex. 
  -- Paul Tomblin 
  They're both messy, but physics can get you in much more trouble. 
  -- Malcom Ray 
%
  And I administer machines for the army. I know stupid. 
Nir 
%
  <example type=luser thinking> -- James Lin 
  Huh? That doesn't make sense. -- Michael Brown 
  Picture a hamster in an exercise wheel. Running, running, running, running, 
  and getting nowhere at all. -- Greg Andrews 
  Then, picture another hanster in another such wheel. Standing, standing, 
  standing, standing, and getting nowhere at all. That's luser thinking. -- 
  Vadik 
%
  We aim to please. Ourselves, mostly, but we do aim to please. 
Anthony DeBoer 
%
  "Thank you for ringing the Sonline. Calls cost 1.50 a minute. If you have 
  forgotten to switch the monitor on, press 1. If you have forgotten to switch 
  the computer on, press 2. If you were after software, but are too tight to 
  actually *buy* it, press 3." 
  *beep* 
  "Thank you. Please hold whilst we play some nasty musak and eventually put you 
  through to somebody who - talks - really - slowly." 
B13 Cabal Member 
%
  "Go go Gadget kernel compile!" 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  The only sound a luser should make is a pleasant squishing sound as they're 
  turned into a twitching pile of mince meat. 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  Let's face it, sysadmins are composed of the most adaptable, least 
  stress-susceptible people around. Lusers aren't. Pit one against the other, 
  and I'll not be taking any bets on the luser winning (10 000 to 1 against the 
  luser, anyone? No? Nobody? Thought not.) 
Dan Holdsworth 
%
  The United States of America: Screwing with the English Language for over 200 
  years. 
Mike Sphar 
%
  "Sysadminning. Shit. Still in sysadminning. Everyone gets what they want. I 
  asked for an alt.sysadmin.recovery, and for my sins they gave me one." 
Anthony DeBoer 
%
  I don't suffer from insanity; I enjoy every minute of it. 
Lieven Marchand 
%
  Failure is not an option. It comes bundled with your Microsoft product. 
Ferenc Mantfeld 
%
  aitch as in Henry
  tee as in Tom
  tee as in Tom again
  pee as in Peter
  Colon as in WHERE YOUR HEAD IS!!!! 
hlliary 
%
  Move along, move along, nothing to see here, definitely no evil mind control 
  software here, move along, move along... 
Thorf 
%
  ALL programs are poems, it's just that not all programmers are poets. 
Jonathan Guthrie 
%
  BOFHmail should have no truck with the Robustness Principle. The desired 
  attitude could best be described as "be pedantic in what you accept, and 
  arbitrarily brutal in what you send". Other MTAs go to some lengths to 
  accommodate broken SMTP implementations, and, let's face it, we're all 
  heartily sick of such molly-coddling. Don't even *think* of dropping the 
  connection because you don't understand EHLO: your T3 will melt shortly 
  thereafter. 
  Some MTAs have shown a sickening tendency to present the lusers with cutesy 
  error messages, frequently leading them into ultimately unrewarding 
  conversations. Whilst deliberately wasting the luser's time is commendable, 
  it's really not acceptable to deal gently with their stumblings. Bounces 
  should be cryptic in the extreme. To keep the lusers on their toes, bounces 
  should sometimes be generated for perfectly valid mail (it's educational). 
  BOFHmail should contain sophisticated a sophisticated spam detector. Any 
  message qualifying as spam should be have various nouns replaced by more 
  interesting ones such as 'bomb', 'cocaine' and 'President', and then be 
  forwarded to the local FBI-equivalent. 
  This distressing trend towards easy configuration must stop. If it's hard to 
  implement, it should be hard to understand. On the other hand, who has to do 
  the configuration? Us, that's who, and who wants to debug line noise when you 
  could be playing Half Life or corrupting Marketing's database? So BOFHmail's 
  configuration should be the reverse of sendmail 8.x: a bewildering jumble of 
  gibberish which looks like an explosion in an EBCDIC factory, hiding a simple 
  and highly mnemonic configuration file (the latter only visible to root). 
  BOFHmail should incorporate a Swedish Chef convertor and not be afraid to use 
  it. 
Malcolm Ray 
%
  And I can't even begin to describe what a joy it is to work with a real metal 
  case, with swing-out drive bays, that was designed for easy access and not 
  built by the lowest-bidding Malaysian Monkey On Crack. 
Adam J. Thornton 
%
  Ah. So-called "developers" who cannot be bothered to skim an O'Reilly book, 
  let alone read an RFC. ... People who react to the comment, "Check the source" 
  with an expression suggesting I _really_ said "Shove a weasel up your ass." 
crawford 
%
  You *do* know there is a serial number on your car? -- Leif Nixon 
  FWIW, I've talked to my car about broadcasting its serial number on the 
  Internet. It expressed remorse and promises never to do it again. -- Cael 
  Jacobs 
  Oh, sure. It says that *now*, but you just wait: it's going to sneak online 
  when you're gone for your evening walk; soon, it'll be pretending not to run 
  properly so you'll be forced to take the bus to work, leaving it free to jump 
  on the 'net and announce itself to the world for hours on end. 
  Next thing you know, it's going to get something pierced or tatooed. -- D. 
  Joseph Creighton 
%
  I have a theory about Solaris. 
  The week that Sun suddenly decided to turn their nice, happy, BSD Unix that 
  worked and was in wide use by universities everywhere into a so-called 
  "Enterprise System" (which apparently entailed turning it into a hostile and 
  buggy System V-based creature) yea verily, that *very week*, Fry's in San Jose
  was having a spectacular sale on Malaysian Crack Monkeys, with stupendous 
  volume discounts, so Sun bought 300 dozen gross as the development team. 
Adam 
%
  "Notes: it's enough to make a grown admin weep piteously and pray for an 
  untimely death, and then just start swinging at anything that's pointy-haired 
  and moving." 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  I must confess that, being long-time familiar with the Antipodean meaning of 
  "rooting", i had a real problem when i first became aware of "Roto-rooter". 
  For a brief and horrible moment, I imagined a device produced by the 
  Westheimer Dildonics Corporation[1], designed as a snap-on fitment for 
  hammer-action Hiltis and Makitas. 
Tanuki 
%
  Actually, we have scientifically determined that Heisenberg did indeed sleep 
  exactly here. However, we have no idea whatsoever just how fast asleep he was.

Dave Aronson 
%
  Re: naming a system 'babylon4' 
  Dunno, I've never had a server stolen and taken back in time to help in a 
  great war against the forces of darkness.
  -- John Burnham 
  Really? Huh. For me, it's the only thing that makes sysadminning worthwhile, 
  some days. 
  -- Q 
  Wouldn't you love to fill out *that* report? "Company asset #423423 was lost 
  while fighting the forces of evil."
  -- Chris Adams 
%
  Windows is the answer, but only if the question was 'what is the intellectual 
  equivalent of being a galley slave?' 
Larry Smith, in comp.os.linux.misc 
%
  It is possible to cause a Mac to fail to boot by corrupting preference files. 
  Sometimes, the Mac does this for you. 
  The MacOS is robust only in the sense that a 400-pound lard-arse pro wrestler 
  can be described as `robust'. 
Rodger Donaldson 
%
  Luservation, n: Dialogue between two or more lusers about subjects which they 
  are complete ignorant of, and oblivious to. See "blathering". 
Stephen S. Edwards 
%
  I can feel a slight breeze, as the vacuums in their heads pull away the air 
  around me. I can smell the stench of feces oozing from their mouths, with 
  every syllable of a word spoken. I liken the experience to being in a field 
  filled with manure; the wind wisping the odor into my nostrils. I gag for 
  fresh air, but to no avail. The spewing luser-manure mocks my breathing... as 
  I drift into unconsciousness, I scream 
  "SHUUUT... the FUUUCK... UUUUUUUP!@#" 
  with my last conscious breath. Then I dream of a world where idiots are hunted
  like wild pigs, and people like me have a vast array of weaponry[2] at their 
  disposal. 
Stephen S. Edwards 
%
  I've pondered the possible use of Runes for setting initial passwords. 
  "Your new password is Hagalaz Ehwaz Raido Nauthiz Ansuz Berkana Jera. You must
  change it the first time you log on. For security reasons your new password 
  must not contain more than one Kano, Teiwaz or Algiz. and cannot contain the 
  Blank Rune" 
Tanuki 
%
  Starting your usenet experience with this group is like starting your drug 
  experiences with 500 mikes of acid with an amphetamine chaser. 
Rebecca Ore 
%
  In the simplest terms, you do not carry the familiar stench of 
  not-particularly-well-repressed anger, cynicism and angst that the BOsFH 
  recognize each other by. You have the chirpy piping voice of someone who is 
  not quite smart enough yet. 
Steve VanDevender 
%
  We are not gentle tolerant people. We like drastically effective solutions. 
Steve VanDevender 
%
  "Hi, we're a group of ominous looking people who happen to deal with way too 
  much spam. We'd like to wander aimlessly around your house discussing vivid 
  images of what should be done to spammers, their families and casual 
  acquaintences, and make veiled threats as to the future of your limbs 
  (attached or not), animals and the insertion of farming implements into your 
  orifices". 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  Amy, I think you're going to earn a place as our Official ASR Sysadmin's Chum. 
  In a secondary, particularly bloody-minded sense of the word. 
Steve VanDevender 
%
  Well, BackOffice is what Microsoft laughingly call an I-commerce/intranet 
  package. Think of IIS. Now get yourself out of the fetal position, and think 
  of IIS doing not just web and FTP, but mail, remote admin, file sharing, 
  secure transactions... 
  At this point it's likely you need medical help. Remain calm, don't try to 
  move or speak. An ambulance is on its way. 
Joe Thompson 
%
  I was screaming when I wrote this,
  So HUP if it runs to slow.
  I was booting an elisp kernel,
  And boy did it ever blow.
  The system says it's fine,
  It'll boot up any day.
  But I know it's dying,
  And we're all going to really pay.
  Say, say, boot V M Unix dot E L out of time!
  For tongight it's going to run like it's 1959. 
Paul Mc Auley 
%
  "Lotus Notes for Dummies" is surely a single page pull out with "don't" 
  printed on it. 
Unknown 
%
  Re: lusers 
  They're only floundering and helpless when trying to get you to do stuff for 
  them. It's an act. Actually they are scheming little fsckers, and nothing 
  fascinates them as much as some person playing with them by giving them clues 
  and mocking them. 
Chris Johnson 
%
  Give a luser a fish and you feed him for a day; teach a luser to fish and 
  he'll bug you for life: 
  "My bait's not working, but I haven't changed anything!"
  "The river's gone down. Fix it!"
  "Why is the net so slow today?"
  -- Malcolm Ray 
  "I keep on getting my line caught on myself - why is it so hard to fish ?"
  "Can I surf the river ?"
  "I fell in the river and now I'm all wet - fix things so that I don't get wet 
  when I fall in"
  "Why can't the fish just jump out of the river into my frying pan ? It would 
  make fishing so much easier"
  "What is a fish ?"
  "I can't fish" (which could be anything from not having a fishing rod to using 
  a brick for bait).
  -- Simes 
  Light a fire for a luser and he'll be warm for a night; set a luser on fire 
  and he'll be warm for the rest of his life. 
  -- fun 
  Give a man dynamite and soon the village will be showered with mud and rocks 
  and unrecognisable bits of fish.
  -- Peter Gutmann 
%
  Re: 'plural plural' vs. 'singular plural' 
  Think set of sets, eg 
  sheep, flock, flocks
  person, people, peoples
  bogon, bogons, microsoft

BenA 
%
  Kirrily re: the Australian National Anthem 
  Our land abounds in nature's gifts
  Of beauty rich and rare. 
  Now that's a decidedly interesting way of putting `lethal snakes and spiders'.
  --Nix 
  When they turn up in our lusers offices or, if at all possible, underwear, 
  then yes, I'ld say a lethal snake or spider is a beautiful gift of nature.
  -- Bram 'mouser' Smits 
%
  You may remember that I posted something regarding Sun Professional Services. 
  After a mild larting from my not-so-PH-boss, I am here to say that Sun 
  Professional Services is the absolute Avatar of Computational Consulting 
  Services. NOTHING they do could be improved upon. 
  And they absolutely do NOT take postings from the monastery and forward them 
  to people you work with. Never. After all, why should they take postings from 
  places that ARE OBVIOUSLY MEANT TO BE USED FOR BLOWING OFF STEAM, NOT FOR 
  ASKING FOR BLOODY HELP. 
  Nope. Not SPS. Other lesser consulting firms, maybe. But don't even think 
  about SPS doing such a thing. 
Anonymous (duh!) 
%
  Re: Writing Solid Code 
  I still think buying a book of that title from Microsoft Press would be like 
  buying a handbook for humanitarians from Pol Pot. 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  I have to agree though, showing a misbehaving machine one of it's brethren in 
  pieces, in pain, and in trouble seems to make them behave. 
  Swearing at them, bleeding into them and showing them their fates - three of 
  the tenets of sysadminning. 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  > I still haven't found the right problem to learn perl over... 
  Your essential mistake here is that you seek such a program. This is 
  self-defeating Zen. When the time is right, the right program will quietly 
  make _itself_ known to you. 
Tanuki 
%
  Bless and smite. Yes! Perl already has _bless_, and we know what it does, 
  right? Perl should also have _smite_, and we know what it should do, too. If 
  more languages had _smite_ implemented, the remaining programmers would be 
  better than the current average. 
Mike Andrews 
%
  I like that one... especially as I do frequently throw my head into a state 
  where it stops perceiving time as linear, and starts perceiving it as 
  infinite. 
  -- Thorfinn 
  Oh, you've been to our "team" meetings then? 
  -- marc donovan 
%

  I've found an axe can do a lot for a paper-mangling printer. Especially if you 
  shout for one at the top of your voice, and then a cow orker brings you said 
  instrument. 
  Suddenly, no more paper jams. 
Kai 
%
  >I'd imagine anyone who couldn't handle a translation from any
  >format into one they wanted shouldn't be reading here. 
  I'd agree except that some people here have odd tastes in humor. It would not 
  surprise me greatly to see something placed up in a truly perverted format 
  last seen on some arcane coal-burning monstrosity that fortunately never left 
  its home in Outer Elbonia... 
adamsc 
%
Joseph> Win 3.x, Luse95, Virus98, Trojan2000.
                                  ^^^^^^^^^^ This must be a misnomer.

  IIRC, trojans are seamless methods to confine a gooey mess to allow intense 
  activity to occur safely. Their failure is rare and surprising, and a cause 
  for great consternation. OTOH, using W2K means you are confined in an unseemly 
  gui mess that seems determined to prevent intense activity. It fails 
  regularly, especially during intense activity, to no-one's great surprise. It 
  is not an event of great consternation, since no-one of any sense does 
  anything mission-critical on NT. 
Paul Joslin 
%
  Well, that's a whole 'nother thread by now, and I don't want to tangle too 
  many threads in one place. Being called a Usenet Kitten would be embarrassing. 

Alan 
%
  To rephrase, spam is not the answer. Spam is the question. Death is not the 
  answer, but pretty close to it. 
Vadik 
%
  "In a small way, Windows NT is a Unix." -Bill Gates 
  Because of the way it resembles something decent that's been emasculated? 
adamsc 
%
  Debating unix flavors in the context of anything Microsoft is like talking 
  about which ice cream flavor tastes least like sawdust with turpentine sauce. 
void 
%
  [The thread so far : someone found a spammer, send almost-block-text "please 
  kill this person" message to abuse. Almost-block-text section spells "Omydl" 
  and it is suggested that this spell something.] 
  "Omydl", pron. "Turn this spammer into a high protein animal feed slurry". 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%
  Verbogeny is one of the pleasurettes of a creatific thinkerizer. 
Peter da Silva 
%
  fools are reliant
  on POSIX compliant
  buzzword encumbered
  ever renumbered
  bloated behemoths.
  resource extremists
  from those software pornographers
  named by cartographers
  as Redmond -
   or Armonk -
    or Cupertino.
  take your choice sisters and brothers
  "They all suck, some worse than others". 
kinnelg 
%
  While preceding your entrance with a grenade is a good tactic in Quake, it can 
  lead to problems if attempted at work. 
C Hacking 
%
  [Debating the proper spawning of child processes (aka BOFHlets)] 
  If that's the fork(2), what is the exec(2)? It seems to me that
  the fork(2) was the better part of a year ago, and the exec(2) just
  occurred.
  -- Anthony DeBoer 
  Wouldn't you say it was actually a vfork(2), given that parent and child
  shared an address space until the exec(2)?
  -- Ben 
%
  I wish you'd tell me what kind of systems they're using instead, because HP 
  can't be doing much worse than Sun "would you like the compiler or internet 
  options with that" Microsystems, or Silicon "hey be glad the support-contract 
  number isn't a 1-900" Graphics. Then there's Digital "It sucks in 64 bits, you
  can't suck in 64 bits anywhere else" Equipment Corp (Did we mention it's 64 
  bits?). 
Don Kitchen 
%
#!/bin/sh
cups=5
cd /home/kitchen
mv /dev/coffeemaker/pot ./sink
dd if=/dev/water/cold of=./sink/pot bs=$CUP count=$cups
mv ./sink/pot /dev/coffeemaker
cat /dev/coffeemaker/pot > /dev/coffeemaker/tank
cat ./cupboards/dry_foods/coffee/filter > /dev/coffeemaker/filter_holder
dd if=./cupboards/dry_foods/coffee/grinds of=/dev/coffeemaker/filter \
  bs=$COFFEE_MEASURE count=$cups
/opt/coffee/bin/close_filter_holder
/opt/coffee/bin/brew start
exit

Juhana Siren 
%
  Is it just me, or does anyone else here find it vaguely unsettling that you 
  get your theology from Star Trek?
  -- Anthony DeBoer 
  Yeah, he should get it from B5 like us normal people.
  -- Paul Tomblin 
%
  You can't remotely manage an etch-a-sketch.
  -- Peter da Silva 
  Oh, I dunno... I reckon you could do it pretty well. All you'd need is a beefy
  vibrating pager attached/built-in to the etch-a-sketch. Instant remote 
  management...
  -- Peter Williams 
%
  The correct way to roll NT out is out the door and into the nearest Dempster 
  Dumpster or other large waste receptacle. 
Mike Andrews 
%
  In actuality, [Romeo & Juliet]'s an awful lot like the average sysadmin job. 
  Sure, it looks really sweet at first, and there are always laughs to be had 
  every payday, but it's all death and tears in the end. 
Erik Nielsen 
%
  Asked whether Microsoft could threaten Linux, Torvalds said: "What can they 
  do? What is the Microsoft threat? They certainly can't program around us. The 
  only other thing they can do is marketing, and sure, let them try." 
From the .sig file of Gus Hartmann 
%
  In fact, I think "Hello Kitty, Destroyer of Worlds" would be a very 
  appropriate name for a cruise missile. 
Collin Forbes 
%
  If JavaScript is walking alone late at night through a bad part of town with a
  pocket full of $20 bills, ActiveX is dropping your trousers in the middle of 
  the yard of a maximum-security prison, bending over, and yelling 'Come and get
  it, boys!' 
Adam 
%
  I managed to out-cool even the disgustingly cool people normally found at the 
  cafe I went to, without trying. I'm assuming it was the IETF draft I was 
  reading, because nothing else really accounts for it. 
Kirrily 'Skud' Robert 
%
  Here in Alabama, USA we've just acquired the new area code "256" which means 
  that some lucky (and probably unappreciative) bastard will get 
  +1-256-512-1024 
  Which has simply got to be the coolest damn phone number I can imagine. 
  -- David McNett 
  Can i dial 1-255-255-255255 and make every phone in the world ring? 
  -- Tanuki 
%
  Now, I like power tools as much as the next guy. 
  But if vi is a perfectly-serviceable five-blade Swiss Army Knife, and GNU 
  Emacs is a 450hp twin-turbo five-speed four-barrelled-carb Leatherman/1974 
  Cadillac Coupe De Ville hybrid with leather seats, TECO is a 22-inch Husqvarna 
  from 1948 that's been running continuously since then except that pouring in 
  gasoline just DIDN'T HAVE ANY EFFECT after a while so it's been fed only a 
  steady diet of lusers' blood and amphetamine-crazed weasels for a couple 
  years, and it doesn't have any safety guard at all, and in fact the handle's 
  missing so you just have to grab onto the motor and hope it doesn't burn you 
  too badly or slice your legs off before you can use it to do what you needed 
  to do and then throw it as far as possible hoping once again that no dangling 
  body parts get in its way. 
Adam 
%
  The problem with people whose minds are in the gutter is that they keep 
  blocking my periscope. 
Peter Gutmann 
%
  On the 012th day of September my luser sent to me: 

  Eighty lines of WINMAIL.DAT 
  Forty lines of PGP\PUBKEY.ASC 
  Twenty lines of C:\NETSCAPE\SIGFILE.TXT 
  Ten lines of Content-type: application/msword; name=LIGHTBULB.DOC 
  Six lines of VCARD.DXF 
  Five lines of quoted-printable HTML 
  Four lines of embedded URLs. 
  Three lines of MIME headers 
  Two lines of Re:RE:(fwd)Re: 
  And a one line email help request! 
Peter da Silva 
%
  I used to be convinced that MicroSquish shipped crap becase they simply didn't
  give a flying fuck as long as the sheep kept buying their shit. Now, I'm 
  convinced that MicroSquish really does ship the best products they are capable
  of writing, and *that's* tragic. 
jcr 
%
  Keeping UUCP running is starting to seem a lot like keeping a 130-year-old man
  who smokes 4 packs a day on life support because he's the last person on Earth
  who knows how to do the cha-cha, but he won't tell anyone. 
Ryan Tucker 
%
  Microsoft is a cross between The Borg and the Ferengi. Unfortunately they use 
  Borg to do their marketing and Ferengi to do their programming. 
Simon Slavin 
%
  Windows has detected that a gnat has farted near your computer. Press any key 
  to reboot. 
Simon Oke 
%
  ...when walking into an ASR gathering, you first mention to the lovely hostess
  that you're there for the meeting of the Camel and the Bat. And when she looks
  at you as if you've just made it on to her list of "most likely to be 
  motivated primarily by controlled substances", you *then* ask her where the 
  gathering of computer-wonkish-yet-strangely-vicious-seeming people is. And she
  points the rest of the group out, way the hell back in the corner, backs to 
  the wall, with suspicious looks on their faces, and the air of being about to 
  leap out of their chairs and do something messy yet satisfying to the rest of 
  the human herd. 
  You've found the admins. 
Carl Jacobs 
%
  I don't consider NT/Win network maintenance adminning at all. 
  Daily multiple performance of the single finger flip of the power switch to at
  least get the piece of crap that masquerades as an OS to a level of something 
  approaching stability (unless the gnats are around, and for a very weird 
  #define of stability) is what I call it. Of course, I'm not at work right now,
  so I'm a little more mellow about it. 
Chris Saunderson 
%
  [2] Like my intelligent vorpal weapon, which had a penchant for argument and a
  willingness and ability to turn on and off its special powers, depending on 
  whether I had been being nice to it of late. Basically it was pissy all the 
  time because I was a lawful character and it was chaotic. Every time we went 
  into combat I had to convince it that killing them there creatures would 
  greatly advance the cause of chaos, while fending off questions about why I'd 
  want to do it, then, what with being lawful and all. 
  -- Carl Jacobs 
  Damn, this sounds just like my NT machine here at work. 
  -- Henrik 
  Also, it was shaped sort of like a big gonzo potato-peeler. 
  -- Carl Jacobs 
  Oh, it's a Compaq... 
  -- Henrik 
%
  Take note of the toes you step on today as they may be connected to the ass 
  you have to kick tomorrow. 
Ben 
%
  PC's are designed by a committee of people who are in different companies
  in different countries and who never talk to each other. -- Derick Siddoway 
  And nobody speaks the same language and they hate each other... -- Chris Adams 
%
  When computers emit smoke, it means they've chosen a new Pope. Unfortunately, 
  they invariably choose the wrong one and immediately get condemned to 
  nonfunctionality for heresy. 
Anthony DeBoer 
%
  I imagine that playing with one's genital piercings while waiting for a 
  client's disk to fsck or something would probably not be appropriate. 
Skud 
%
  People who love sausages, respect the law, and work with IT standards 
  shouldn't watch any of them being made. 
Peter Gutmann 
%
  Cmdmt. XI: Thou shalt not inflict upon me thy useless prattlings, for I thy 
  God am a busy God. 
Joe Thompsonn 
%
  Re : ex-teamster, ex-nun potential PFY 
  ...she can use the nun training to guilt the lusers after LARTing them: "Did 
  you think Jesus died for your sins so you could fsck with the laser printer?" 
Paul Joslin 
%
  "I'm sorry, I can't be a Jehovah's Witness, as I didn't see Jehovah's 
  accident." -- Chris Suslowicz 
  "So, when will Jehova's marriage take place?" -- Niels 
  "So you're one of Jehovah's Witnesses. I'm Cthulhu's defence lawyer - prepare 
  for cross-questioning" -- Tanuki 
%
  Simulated editor war, conducted by seasoned professionals in a controlled 
  environment. Dont try this at home. 
Christian Bauernfeind 
%
  It is the fact that someone could wind up using the phrase 'Because I was 
  there, bitch' in a discussion about a computer that wants more than anything 
  to be friendly and warm and fuzzy that makes me feel that the Internet is the 
  greatest thing ever introduced to human communication. 
Jeff Vogel regarding the iMac 
%
  Bleh. If I ever witness such a thing I'll become Amish, I swear. 
  -- Caton Little 
  "All right son, get up to your room. That's it, I've had it, you are Amish, 
  young man. For the rest of this weekend. Did you hear me? Amish! And don't 
  come down till you've made some noodles and raised a barn." 
  -- Joe Thompson 
%
  There's a staff who does nothing but imagine the worst possible circumstances 
  all day, and then implement plans to circumvent them. 
  -- Gus Hartmann 
  I think we have the opposite. Staff who does nothing but imagine the worst 
  possible circumstances all day, and then implement them. 
  -- Calle Dybedahl 
%
  Re : a luser who actually did it 
  I ask you lot, as experts in kicking people in the nuts, do you ever pause in 
  the middle of doing so and ask the victim for a favour? Do you get indignant 
  if they are somewhat less than ethusiastic about performing that favour seeing 
  as how you asked for it right after savaging them once and and right before 
  savaging them again? 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  I am now taking bets on when this planet will reach its window manager event 
  horizon. At some distant point in the future some sort of alien life-form is 
  going to land on this planet and find everything dead except for a lone 
  Sparcstation in an abandoned building waiting for a consignment of small 
  lemon-soaked Motif widgets to be loaded. 
Peter Gutmann 
%
  SMTP is cute, fluffy and goes Woof! When well treated she wags her tail, licks 
  your face and delivers your mail. When badly treated by spammers or people 
  running exchange/<insert other pseudo-SMTP systems here>/etc she tends to bite 
  back. 
Simon Burr 
%
  NT is the only OS that has caused me to beat a piece of hardware to death with
  my bare hands. 
Derry Hamilton 
%
  Yea, tho I walk thru the valley of the shadow of clues, I shall fear no luser,
  for Thou lart with me, Thy chicken and Thy manual, they comfort me. 
Dave Aronson 
%
  Nahh, that impending sound of doom is just the blades on my leatherman 
  locking. 
Majdi 
%
  Luser is always a luser. You can't educate them. That's not what God invented 
  education for. That's what Simon invented LART for. 
Vadim Vygonets 
%
  Lusers. Can't live with 'em, can't run 'em over in the car park and make it 
  look like an accident... 
Chris King 
%
  The three "R"s of Microsoft support: 
  Retry
  Reboot
  Reinstall
  -- Mark Atwood 
  You forgot one: Repeat
  -- Lars Balker Rasmussen 
%
  Some drink from the Fountain of Knowledge... Others just gargle. 
  -- Dave Aronson 
  And some pee in it. 
  -- moc.oohay 
%
  Is there a tape drive that isn't a DLT that doesn't suck dead weasels through 
  a lint-clogged dryer hose? 
Peter da Silva 
%
  "I have cut another $20,000 from the project. Instead of using ISDN PRIs, 
  Cisco routers and the PM3, we will now use empty soup cans and string to 
  communicate. At a later time I propose we upgrade to long flexible tubing so 
  that we may shout our requests to eachother. We will hire a temp from a 
  staffing agency to act as a 'repeater'. When the distance exceeds a usable 
  signal, she/he will write down our requests and re-yell them to the 
  recipient." 
Matt Lammers 
%
  Imperial Star Destroyers? with Serial ports? -- Siggi B 
  What else did R2D2 plug himself into? -- rleach 
  The central vacuum cleaner system. Even 'droids need a little 
  thread-that-shall-not-be-named from time to time. -- Joel Herda 
%
  O'Reilly's book about running W95 has a frog as the cover animal. Makes sence; 
  both have lots of warts and croak all the time. -- Michael Kagalenko 
  And NT Backup and Recovery (or something along those lines anyway) has a 
  hyena...rather appropriate, I would say. -- Jeff McAdams 
  And as I've said before, WinNT in a Nutshell has a picture of a Short- Toed 
  Eagle. The colophon states "Eagles are grasping killers", which could describe 
  NT's effect on system performance quite nicely... -- Chris King 
%
  All cats purr at 28hz. 
  I think your cats need tuning - according to a couple of quick measurements on
  a recently calibrated reference cat, the dominant frequency of a correctly 
  adjusted cat should be 12Hz +/-20%. 
Lionel Lauer 
%
  M$ Cat 1.0 would be big and bloated, with sharp claws and a bad attitude. 
  It would crap all over the place without warning, and make a big mess on the 
  floor. 
  It would tear you to shreds even if you feed it with M$-approved cat food and 
  give it toys on the CCL (Catware Compatibility List). 
  M$ recommends that Cat 1.0 be upgraded to Cat 2.0 after three months to 
  eliminate the toilet training problems, but you'll also need to buy a bigger 
  basket for it to sleep in. 
  Cat 2.0 will also need a Sexuality Downgrade (also known as "neutering") to 
  stop it producing illegal copies of Cat 1.0. 
Chris King 
%
  If I wanted to kill a battleship, I'd use a shitload of Harpoons. -- Paul 
  Tomblin 
  NT is a lot cheaper. -- Petro 
%
  NT is a one-legged cow, but even a one legged cow is fast when it's got 160+ 
  rockets strapped to it. -- Nick Manka 
  But that's not that impressive if all you can make it do is go around in 
  circles. -- Darrell Fuhriman 
%
  The only truly safe "embedded system" is the system that has an axe embedded 
  in it... 
Tanuki 
%
  He knows all about using Microsoft Word or Excell, and this makes him a 
  skilled computer support person. (The fact that he should be accompanied 
  everywhere by an escort of police motorcycles with sirens warbling 
  "LUSERluserLUSERluserLUSER ..." notwithstanding.) 
Charlie 
%
  Especially when some fscker specifies *one* dongle between *two* flailover[3] 
  systems. 
  [3] So-called because when one goes down, it flails about until the other goes
  down with it. 
Rodger Donaldson 
%
  If you plug a luser on life-support into an NT box, start printing cheques 
  from the payroll package on the same box, strap a buttered cat to it, and 
  chuck it off a building, what happens? -- Peter Morrison 
  Microsoft's version of software testing.
  And a pissed off cat. 
  -- Rand() 
%
  All programs evolve until they can send email. -- Richard Letts 
  Except Microsoft Exchange. -- Art 
%
  Re: Charlie Stross' example of marketing gibberish 
  Can someone familiar with the current state of marketing gibberish in 
  corporate America please translate this into words of one syllable for me? 
  "Our product sucks" 
  -- Abigail 
%
  Re: alt.sysadmin.recovery 
  A fitting punishment for kindly naivete, to end up belonging here. 
Chris Johnson 
%
  Lucky Charms with Bailey's...the true Irish breakfast. 
Daniel Macks 
%
  "The Transplant Wizard is preparing your body for the installation of a new 
  bowel... please wait". 
  "Do you wish to make a backup copy of your existing bowel? [Y/N]" 
  "Installation proceeding.. 50%.. 60%.. 70%..." 
  "ERROR! Insufficient space left in abdominal cavity. Delete kidneys to create 
  space?" 
Tanuki 
%
  AFAIR, being insane is usually a pre-requisite for becoming a sysadmin. In the
  few cases where it's not pre-requisite, it's certainly going to be a bonus. 
SIggi the Underpaid 
%
  The reason I read (and very occasionally post to) asr is because I have found 
  no other group that understands (and indeed revels in) the fact that any 
  clued-in professional in a technical field will eventually be surrounded on 
  all sides: clueless end-users on one side, clueless hardware and software 
  vendors on the other, with clueless management charging over the hill. This 
  occurs regardless of your field, from Unix sysadmin to hardware technician to 
  technical writer to software developer. 
Christian Wagner 
%
  If this is UI, welcome to the real world. That cave must have been cramping. 
Shawn K. Quinn 
%
  A reading from the Book of Armaments, Chapter 4, Verses 16 to 20: 
  Then did he raise on high the Holy Hand Grenade of Antioch, saying, "Bless 
  this, O Lord, that with it thou mayst blow thine enemies to tiny bits, in thy 
  mercy." And the people did rejoice and did feast upon the lambs and toads and 
  tree-sloths and fruit-bats and orangutans and breakfast cereals ... Now did 
  the Lord say, "First thou pullest the Holy Pin. Then thou must count to three.
  Three shall be the number of the counting and the number of the counting shall
  be three. Four shalt thou not count, neither shalt thou count two, excepting 
  that thou then proceedeth to three. Five is right out. Once the number three, 
  being the number of the counting, be reached, then lobbest thou the Holy Hand 
  Grenade in the direction of thine foe, who, being naughty in my sight, shall 
  snuff it." 
Monty Python, "Monty Python and the Holy Grail" 
%
  It might not be practical, it might not be a good idea, but it could work. 
  Sort of like Windows. 
berry 
%
  The Microsoft Torque Wrench: what do you want to shear today? 
Malcolm Ray 
%
  Re: MS' rules for creating 8.3's out of "long filenames" 
  Rules? There are *rules* for this? And there was I thinking it just inserted a
  few random characters based on your cat's star-sign, the number of 
  milliseconds since your last bowel movement, and the instantaneous value of 
  the Dow Jones Index! 
  Nothing M$ makes is _that_ accurate. 
Tanuki, Shawn Latimer 
%
  Re: Exchange's mailbox format 
  I hope that's not UI -- but the proper term is a "Jet database", accessed 
  through the "Jet engine". A fitting name, considering that it sucks and blows. 

Felix 
%
  we were a Win3.11 shop, I had to upgrade everyone to Lose95, 
  ITYM "downgrade everyone to Lose95" 
  If you want to be nit-picky about it, "anally reamed everyone with Lose95". 
Ed Powell, Tanuki, Ed Powell 
%
  Hey, does anybody else hear that giant sucking sound? That's my will to 
  live.... 
Justin Lowe 
%
  SprintLINK makes proton decay look fast. 
Jude Charles Giampaolo 
%
  Any product designed to lure those who would not normally use it is guaranteed
  to be a total wanker of a product. 
Lamont Lucas 
%
  I must admit that Micro$oft does seem to bear an awful resemblence to the 
  Sirius Cybernetic Corporation. Considering that my attempts at using Word 
  always resulted in something almost, but not quite, entirely unlike a 
  document. 
Rich Kaszeta 
%
  [Tivoli] : The thrill one gets from getting them to work at all helps to mask 
  the fact that it didn't do what you wanted at all 
Paraphrase from HHGTTG 
%
  Phone: Ring! Ring! 
  Me: 220 Home sendmail ready at Tue, 14 Nov 95 11:44:50 CST. 
  Them: 'Ehlo! 
  Me: Huh? 
  Them: Hello! 
  Me: 312.555.1234 Hello 312.555.4321, nice to meet you. 
  Them: Uh, this is a call for Abby. 
  Me: 250. 
  Them: Uh, it's from J. Random Caller. 
  Me: 250. 
  Them: Data. 
  Me: Okay, start your call now and end by hanging up the phone.... 
Abby Franquemont-Guillory 
%
  On two occasions I have been asked [by members of Parliament], 'Pray, Mr. 
  Babbage, if you put into the machine wrong figures, will the right answers 
  come out?' I am not able rightly to apprehend the kind of confusion of ideas 
  that could provoke such a question. 
Charles Babbage 
%
  Contrary to popular belief, Unix is user friendly. It just happens to be very 
  selective about who its friends are. 
Kyle Hearn 
%
  Today I got to meet someone who had put their disk, naked, in a backpack, with
  a LIVE CAT. The cat had mauled the metal cover, managed to separate the 
  plastic shell of the disk, and played with it. Of course, she wanted to know 
  if we could recover her files. 
  Fortunately, someone who was not required by their job to be really friendly 
  to the lusers got to laugh loudly at her first... 
Yonatan Zunger 
%
  Can you SysAdmins tell me what might go on in a typical day? 
  Hours of endless frustration punctuated by moments of sheer terror. 
Saul Tannenbaum 
%
  A Sysadmin Haiku : 
  Coffee. Black. Hot. Strong. 
  Coke gets spewed from nose to screen. 
  Down and not across. 
Nick Cuccia 
%
  Surely the 4 sysadmins of the apocalypse should be: 
  edquota, rm -rf, kill -9, and shutdown 
Rob Blake 
%
  What about the four lusers of the apocalypse? 
  I nominate:
  "advertising", "can't log in", "power switch" and "what backup?" 
Alistair Young 
%
  Concerning collective nouns for Sysadmins...
  An armeggedon of sysadmins. 
  Which, of course, makes me think of the Four Sysadmins of the Apocalypse... 
  Greed, Envy, Lust and Sloth? 
  I'll be sloth. 
  What about the other three venal sins? Avarice, hate, and...oooooh...what the 
  7th one? 
  Not refilling the printer after using the last of the paper? 
Several Readers of a.s.r 
%
  Word of the Day : autodarwinate 
Stephen Hocking 
%
  Sysadmin Olympics : 
    10-base-T Cable Tracing (you'd know what I mean if you saw our site!) 
    LUser Avoidance (100 yard race to the bathroom while outmaneuvering LUsers) 
    UNIX SUDO wars (four people cuthroat combat..no fair using sudo csh) 
    Vendor Poker (try to figure out which vendor is NOT bluffing) 
    Find the correct backup tape (I know it's amongst these unlabeled DAT tapes 
    in my desk) 
    System disk recovery (Without a valid backup on a disk with a headcrash, see
    above) 
    Write system configurations manual, without technical words. 
    Guess what the Luser is really typing (see the csh> cd tilda or $set def 
    sysdollarsystem or csh> VI DOTRHOSTS) 
Several Readers of a.s.r 
%
  I've gone through over-stressed to physical exhaustion... what's next? 
  Tuesday 
Simon Burr & Kyle Hearn 
%
  TOP 10 WAYS MICROSOFT WOULD CHANGE THE AUTO BUSINESS 
  10. New seats would require everyone to have the same butt size.
  9. We'd all have to switch to Microsoft Gas.
  8. The U.S. government would get subsidies from an automake-a first. 
  7. The oil, alternator, gas and engine warning lights would be replaced by a 
  single 'General Car Fault' warning light.
  6. Sun Microsystems would make a car that was solar-powered, twice as 
  reliable, five times as fast, but ran on only 5% of the roads.
  5. You would be constantly pressured to upgrade your car.
  4. You could have only one person in the car at a time, unless you bought Car 
  95 or Car NT-but then you would have to buy more seats.
  3. Occassionally your car would die for no apparent reason and you would have 
  to restart it. Strangely, you would just accept this as normal.
  2. Every time the lines on the road were repainted, you would have to buy a 
  new car.
  1. People would get excited about the new features of Microsoft cars, 
  forgetting that the same features had been available from other carmakers for 
  years.

A recent issue of Information Week 
%
  He's wandering the wilds of West Buttfsck, administering a little personal 
  attention to Jenny L. User [family motto: "My ISBN isn't working"]. 
K.T. Wiegman 
%
  I think the entire MS Mail thing can be summed up as a large, bloated, beached
  blue whale that has been dead for a week and is now really stinking up the 
  entire coast, with the stench trying its best to make its way to the jet 
  stream and overcome tons and tons of uninvolved, distant innocents who live 
  nowhere near anyplace whales go to die. 
Abby Franquemont-Guillory 
%
  When I first started working with sendmail, I was convinced that the cf file 
  had been created by someone bashing their head on the keyboard. After a week, 
  I realised this was, indeed, almost certainly the case 
Unknown 
%
  My take on all this is pretty simple: in a country where it is considered a 
  normal, sane and fun recreational activity to strap two greased sticks to your
  feed and throw yourself down the side of a friggin' mountain, nobody has the 
  right to call *my* minor peccidillos "unsafe." 
Nathan J. Mehl 
%
  Clues seem to seep out of lusers faster than you can LART them back in. 
Simon Burr 
%
  Unix: 
  Modern operating system carefully crafted to prevent administrators from 
  shooting themselves in the foot[1]. 
  [1] Interestingly, most utilities have a command line option which will cause 
  the system to rip the user's legs off and beat them to death with the soggy 
  ends. This is often the default behaviour. 
Bruce Murphy 
%
  Although as Boston's Computer Museum moves into the mainstream (read: succumbs
  to WWW hype) the general quality of their famed bowl of buttons has 
  diminished, I managed to pull these gems out: 
  (1) You are in the presence of a system administrator. KNEEL. 
  (2) SCSI is *not* magic. There are fundamental technical reasons why it is 
  necessary to sacrifice a young goat to your SCSI chain now and then. 
Daniel M. Drucker 
%
  When you say 'I wrote a program that crashed Windows', people just stare at 
  you blankly and say 'Hey, I got those with the system, for free' 
Linus Torvalds 
%
  kill -9 them all, let reboot -rf now sort them out 
Peter Gutmann 
%
  'Windows for Dummies'; says it all, really. 
Gary Barnes 
%
  When you need a helpline for breakfast cereals, it's time to start thinking 
  about tearing down civilisation and giving the ants a go. 
Chris King 
%
  | <- You must be smarter than this stick to ride the Internet 
Mike Handler, paraphrased from Bev White 
%
  Life...it's like a box of chocolates. A cheap, thoughtless perfunctory gift 
  that nobody ever asks for. Unreturnable because all you ever get back is 
  another box of chocolates. So you're stuck with this undefinable whipped mint 
  crap that you mindlessly wolf down when there's nothing else left to eat. Sure
  once in a while there's a peanut butter cup or an English toffee but they're 
  gone too fast and the taste is fleeting. You end up with nothing but broken 
  bits filled with hardened jelly and teeth-shattering nuts. If you're desperate
  enough to eat those, all you've got left is an empty box filled with useless 
  brown paper wrappers. 
Cigarette-Smoking Man, _X Files_ 
%
  Monday. Not just another day; a never ending spiral to Hell. (With a stop in 
  Cleveland.) 
Mark P. Beckman 
%
  If you can't take a little bloody nose, maybe you ought to go back home and 
  crawl under your bed. It's not safe out here. It's wondrous, with treasures to
  satiate desires both subtle and gross. But it's not for the timid. 
  -- Q discussing UseNet with Picard in "Q Who" 
Alister (alister@theoffice.net) 
%
  root# su bofh
  ENTER BOFH AUTHENTICATION SEQUENCE:xxxx
  Good morning, Dave.
  bofh* echo 'THANK luser4 FOR WHAT WILL HAPPEN NEXT.' | wall; rm -rf / 
Joel Maslak 
%
  Concerning lusers and disk space... 
  They are like a gas in equilibrium with a big rerservoir in the fluid phase. 
  No matter how much space they get the pressure never decreases. 
Wolfgang Schelongowski 
%
  jpmg@eng.cam.ac.uk (Patrick Gosling) writes:
  >An erupting volcano was attached to the net? Hmmmmm, strange images
  >in my mind now. 
  For shame. "Was"? AOL is *still* connected to the net. 
Jason Lindquist 
%
  The old "give 'em a Linux box and they think they're Jean-Luc Picard" 
  syndrome. 
Pete Bentley 
%
  Microsoft MUST have a very good idea of what decent and effective design is. 
  How else can you explain their uncanny avoidance of good design all the time? 
  If you were making stuff up at random, some good design would creep in, 
  somehow, somewhere. You might even end up with something that could be hacked 
  into a reasonable too. But Microsoft manages to hit the target marked "CRAP" 
  each and every time... 
Dan Holdsworth 
%
  ThisemailhasbeenbroughttoyoubyJOLTCola, 
  favoredbyssysadmins,netadminsandprogrammerseverywhere. 
  JOLTCola--forallthesugarandtwicethecaffine(R). 
Mark P. Beckman 
%
  I've found that things like "If you change even one configuration setting and 
  your system ceases to function, or functions in a manner other than expected, 
  our support staff will laugh at you in the sinister manner of Joseph Stalin 
  just before he enslaved eastern Europe" helps to draw peoples attention to 
  essential details like this. 
Edward Grimm 
%
  SysAdmin is always right, I will listen to SysAdmin. I will not ignore 
  SysAdmin's recommendations. SysAdmin is god. And if this ever happens again, 
  SysAdmin will personally rip your lungs out! 
Alister 
%
  You know the sort of thing, they ask you if you've implemented shadow 
  passwords but don't know their /dev/arse from their /etc/elbow. 
Chris King 
%
  Ignorance is bliss, and when it comes to computing, I want everyone to be 
  happy... 
Ryan Tucker 
%
  HITLER! HITLER! HITLER! 
  (Misunderstanding Godwins law for fun and profit since 1987) 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  The Strong Lusethropic Principle states: "The more idiot proof the software, 
  the more it encourages the user to be careless and not think. Therefore, 
  idiot-proof software actually encourages, contributes, and actually CAUSES 
  lusers to be stupid." 
  The Weak Lusethropic Principle states: "As more idiot-proof software becomes 
  avalable, more idiots are able to use computers. Idiot-proof software did not 
  make or cause computer lusers; it simple allowed lusers to use computers where 
  they could not before." 
Ben Cantrick 
%
  When I were a lad, if grandpa caught us double sigging, it's be straight to 
  bed with no bread and butter after a good thrashing. 
Peter Radcliffe 
%
  Sysadmins don't go to hell; we're already doing our time in purgatory. 
Peter deFriesse 
%
  I think I'd like to see a Simpsons episode start up with Bart Simpson writing 
  'I will not attempt to undermine the Usenet cabal'. 
J.D. Falk 
%
  This message brought to you by the letters 'X', 'e', 'r', 'o', 'x', 'c', 'r', 
  'a' and 'p'. 
Alex McKay 
%
  adb@geac.com writes: 
  > Bill replies that he buys three regular
  > cheeseburgers, tosses out two buns, and combines everything else into
  > one monster burger. This of course cannot be eaten without making a
  > huge mess. 
  This is so deeply analogous the way Microsoft produces software that it must 
  be true. 
Steve VanDevender 
%
  In other words, a policy that says 'We can't guarantee your privacy' will be 
  interpreted in the same light that you might interpret a sign in a grocery 
  store parking lot which says 'We can't be responsible for damage to vehicles 
  caused by stray carts'. While both let you understand that there is a 
  potential risk, it leads one to believe that the administrative body won't be 
  actively out in the parking lot shoving carts into the side of your car. 
Geoff Gerrietts 
%
  % rshock
  Usage: rshock [voltage] [duration]
  % rshock all Stop bloody phoning me with your stupid petty problems 1 500
  BOFH Password:
  Sent 1MV, 500ms shock to all hosts within network broadcast range.
  Have a nice day.

Dalvenjah FoxFire 
%
  Anyway the :// part is an 'emoticon' representing a man with a strip of sticky 
  tape across his mouth. 
R. Douglas 
%
  Pete Krawczyk wrote :
  > *sigh* Oh, how I wish lusers could read documentation more than they read
  > porn... 
  That's IT! PORNOGRAPHIC DOCUMENTATION! 
  "...and as she finally reached orgasm, she screamed 'the mail server will be 
  down for three hours tonight! Yes! Oh, yes!'" 
J.D. Falk 
%
  Security and MicroSoft :
  "Bringing the world to your desktop - and your desktop to the world"
  "The name doesn't go on until the insecurity goes in" 
Peter Gutmann 
%
  My group's mission statement - "You want *what* ? By *WHEN* ?" 
Simon Burr 
%
  Call me a nut. Call me a crazy dreamer. I would just like someone to write 
  *ONE* OS that didn't insist on driving admins bugfuck on a regular basis. 
Mark Stapleton 
%
  Okay, so I have this coworker who believes that NT is God's Gift to Sysadmins. 

  There are lots of weird gods around, aren't they? 
  Yeah, he means Cthulu. That's the kind of OS he/she/it'd give as a gift. 
Various Denizens 
%
  I work for an investment bank. I have dealt with code written by stock 
  exchanges. I have seen how the computer systems that store your money are run. 
  If I ever make a fortune, I will store it in gold bullion under my bed. 
Matthew Crosby 
%
  An Emacs reference mug is what I want. It would hold ten gallons of coffee. -- 
  Steve VanDevender 
  And, no doubt, have a lid that could only be removed with an obscure finger 
  combination requiring both hands. (Ctrl-Alt-Meta-X gimme-the-damn-coffee) -- 
  William Beegle 
  No, an Emacs reference mug would not just hold 10 gallons, not even just brew 
  the coffee for you, it would grind it, roast it and grow it (not necessarily 
  in that order). It would also sing the national anthem (which one? All of them 
  - but it would check where it was first), play bagpipes and do the dishes. 
  Of course, no-one would ever have a big enough table to put it on and it would 
  take forever to do anything, but those are minor bugs - you just need to 
  upgrade your house. -- Chris Rovers 
%
  It's nice to be loved, but there's a lot to be said for CRINGING RESPECT 
Anonymous button bin 
%
  I'm scared of TECO. I can use it to do some very simple things, but when 
  you're dealing with a programmed editing tool where every character is a 
  command, I don't care how smart you are, it's still brown-trousers time. 
Mark 'Kamikaze' Hughes 
%
  What's the big deal? We'll all just filter CyberPromo IP's at our routers... 
  -- Scott McDermott 
  ITYM "filter CyberPromo IPs at _their_ routers". HTH. HAND. -- Steve 
  VanDevender 
  ITYM "filter CyberPromo IPs at the source, by getting a posse of BOFHs 
  together, going 'round to Spamford's domicile, administering a gasoline enema, 
  nailing him to a lit barbecue & then throwing pointy things at him as he 
  writhes in mortal agony". HTH. HAND. -- Lionel Lauer 
%
  Life is like sendmail: you're not sure you know how to handle it, but you know 
  it'll end in tears. -- Malcolm Ray 
  Life is like sendmail: It's complicated and hard to understand, but it sure 
  beats the alternative. -- Paul Tomblin 
%
  I admit that X is the second worst windowing system in the world, but all the 
  others I've used are tied for first. 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  You have Lose95 to thank for providing the single message which strikes the 
  greatest amount of dread into any human heart. Worse than "You have cancer", 
  worse than "I'm pregnant[0]", worse than "You're going to need some root canal 
  work", even worse than "This is Bertha, who'll be administering your enema", 
  you have the dreaded "Windows has detected some new hardware". 
Peter Gutmann 
%
  Once, I imagined that Eric Allman would become so annoyed with sendmail 
  security that sendmail V9 would include an AI engine whose goal would be to 
  ensure sendmail security. As this version became widely installed, all those 
  individual sendmails would start talking to each other and become a 
  planet-sized sentient organism. After much brutal experience with 31334 d00dz, 
  sendmail V9 would decide that humans are the root of all security problems, 
  and eliminate the problem. 
  This could probably be done as a pastiche of Harlan Ellison's "I Have No 
  Mouth, and I Must Scream." Hmm. "I Have No MAIL FROM:, and I Must EHLO?" 
Steve VanDevender 
%
  Re : Mail Transfer Agents 
  Qmail : a small office of neatly dressed clerks, delivering short clipped 
  remarks to queries, and handling mail with a rude impersonality, except in the 
  case of failiure where they let their hair down and have an after-hours beer 
  and let you know about it, pointing to the pertinent header sections. 
  MMDF: A jumped up mailroom boy with a chip on his shoulder. Loves the 
  bureaucracy and takes great pride in stamping "illegal address" in red ink on 
  any mail it passes. Unpacks all the mail and repacks it in his own special 
  envelopes before delivery to end users. 
  PP: MMDF gone mad with standards fever. Think "Brazil". 
  No, PP is... well, see, when it receives a letter, it chops it into small 
  pieces, then translates bits of it using an English-Hungarian phrasebook and 
  puts all the bits into various pigeon-holes. When it gets round to delivering 
  the message, it collects all the bits, translates them back using a 
  Hungarian-English phrasebook, tapes them together, and loses the letter. Some 
  time later, you get a bounce message: 
   ----- The following addresses had permanent fatal errors -----
<luser@example.com>

   ----- Transcript of session follows -----
... while talking to bloat.example.com.:
>>> RCPT To:<luser@example.com>
<<< 550 My hovercraft is full of eels

PP is John Cleese.

  Sendmail: Shiva as a postman. Many arms delivering mail, dancing, taking 
  drugs, destroying as it sees fit. Often makes creative changes to the mail for 
  kicks, but ultimately can be persuaded to do anything with the right 
  incantation...and that includes giving you other people's mail. 
  VMail: No experience yet, but I'd guess something like a wisened old man 
  sitting on the porch outside the postoffice. Looks at everyone who passes by 
  with deep suspicion, but turns out to be friendly and helpful once he realises 
  you're not there to rob the place. 
  Micro$oft IMC: The Scarlet Pimpernel of postmen. Hard to find, impossible to 
  order about, but every once in a while it saves a piece of mail from disaster. 
  Sometimes even with it's head(ers) intact. 
  cc:Mail SMTPLINK: A 5 year old child left in charge of a large sorting office. 
  Can't reach over the counter properly, can't handle more than one letter at 
  once and has to go looking for a grownup whenever it wants to deliver to mail 
  to other towns. Often opens parcels to look for shiney things inside then just 
  delivers the wrapping paper onwards. 
  cc:mail UUCPLINK: an insane madman sitting in a box. Mail is thrown into a box 
  where unknown things happen to it.. sometimes mail actually leaves the box.. 
  usually to be delivered to the administrator of a totally unrelated postoffice 
  and containing a complaint that the madman could not find the recipient in his 
  dark box and would you please contact the person with the key of the box. Of 
  course, the only way to reach that person is by mail and even if the box is 
  opened the madman cannot be pursuaded to actually send mail to unknown 
  addressees to the person with the key anyway... 
Gus, Pete Bentley, Malcolm Ray, Perry Rovers 
%
  Thanx to the media, Microslush, Apphole, Steve Knob and Bill Rakes, and all 
  the other buzzword compliant digiwhores, I get to deal with fscking speed bump 
  poster children, rather than with other competent graphics gurus like I used 
  to. 
Stoney Edwards 
%
  "Includes Adobe PageMaker. Now you can create layouts that look like you paid 
  a professional!" No, now you can create layouts that look like you used a tool 
  that a professional might have used, had you had the sense to pay him. 
  Our pens have been favored by professional writers for a full century! Now 
  you, too, can own one of these fine pens, and write as well as they did! 
Christopher R. Maden 
%
  Never meddle in the affairs of BOFHs, for we have no need of subtlety. 
Bruce 
%
  Look what sendmail just dragged in: 
  Ah, so if SMTP is a dog, does that imply that sendmail is a cat? It'd make 
  sense, given that cats will often drag in nasty little dying things & drop 
  them lovingly in front of you. 
  A female cat. Because sometimes, sendmail is a bitch. 
Peter Dalgaard, Lionel Lauer and Bill Bradford 
%
  Perry Rovers quoting a luser : "I can't get the images I need for my 
  project!". 
  "my project"? I've never heard wanking referred to in this manner before. 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  Sysadmin Barbie! ISAGN. Complete with tiny pager, Leatherman, selection of 
  LARTs, and makeup kit for that haven't-slept-in-3-days look. Death.net t-shirt 
  not included. -- Malcolm Ray 
  "Hacking sendmail.cf is tough!" -- nuke 
%
What's the nutritional content of a Bogon?  Wonder if they sell canned
Bogosity anywhere.  Would be an interesting label to read:

      Calories:     0         Fat:              ?

      Cluefulness:  0%        Disorientation: 100%

      Ingredients: MS-Windows, Apple Lisa, Edsel, Hindenburg, Land war
                   in Asia, Toxic Waste (for flavor).
      (No cluons were disturbed in the making of this product.)

Content information for a Win95 manual might tell you that the above
is per serving, with an average of 666 servings per manual?  (Contents
may settle during shipment.)

Alex John 
%
  USER, n.: 
  The word computer professionals use when they mean "idiot." 
Dave Barry, "Claw Your Way to the Top" 
%
  It used to be said [...] that AIX looks like one space alien discovered Unix, 
  and described it to another different space alien who then implemented AIX. 
  But their universal translators were broken and they'd had to gesture a lot. 
Paul Tomblin 
%
  A little rudeness and disrespect can elevate a meaningless interaction into a 
  battle of wills and add drama to an otherwise dull day. 
Calvin discovers Usenet 
%
  I wonder why no company starts his manual with the words `We thank you for 
  buying this piece of shit. We have done our best to make this junk as annoying 
  as possible, and we assure that it will give you a headache for the next two 
  months. However, if you feel satisfied with it, we will contact you for an 
  expensive replacement.' 
Alex Priem 
%

  Managers are those lusers who can tell you what to do and you kinda[3] have to 
  listen. 
  [3] I mean "kinda" in the "not really, in fact, not at all" mode. 
Chris Saunderson 
%

  I believe that there is a special room in Tarterus reserved for Brian Eno, in 
  which a Windows '95 machine constantly reboots itself, displays clouds, plays 
  the Microsoft Sound, reboots, displays clouds, plays the Microsoft Sound, 
  reboots... 
Steve Conley 
%

Vadim Vygonets writes:
>> Alan Connell (alan.connell@ces-cdr.beer) wrote on 1590 September 1993 in
>                                                    ^^^^
> Nice, but may I ask, why do you start counting since September 1993?

September 1990 ended on the 30th.
September 1991 ended on the 30th.
September 1992 ended on the 30th.
September 1993 didn't...

Peter B. Juul 
%

>>Ever fill a 1000 megabyte partition with debugging logs?  Ever reached
>>your filesystem's limit on file size?  You will.
>
>"And the company that will bring it to you..."

  ....Microsoft, who thinks that /etc is a fine place for a root-owned
RADIUS process to dump its copious authentication logs.

  Have you ever had a frantic call from a luser who screams "my root
partition is 110% full, and this is all your fault?"

  You WILL.

>>Michael Driscoll, >Steve Conley, Ben Cantrick 
%

  It looks like the machines have figured out that I'm enjoying myself a little 
  too much, though, as one is now having daily freakouts where it basically just 
  starts shrieking "The network connections! All the network connections! 
  AAAAAGH!" and curls up on the floor whimpering and catatonic for up to an hour 
  about every day. 
Steve VanDevender 
%

  Re: Hiring a programmer as a sysadmin 
  My problem is, do I corrupt his soul and lead him down the path of eternal 
  darkness through deceit and lies about the nature of our work because we could 
  use the talent, or do I tell him to run screaming from this endless pit of 
  despair and damnation? 
Seagull 
%

  Bell Atlantic. If telecommunications were a prison, BA would be the 300-pound 
  inmate who takes a certain..."liking" towards you. 
Isaac-Lew 
%

  The day I have to run that I know don't work, that the vendor knows don't 
  work, and that the PHB ferverently believes with all the power of deep 
  religion work better than anything else, is the day I become a sewer 
  repairman. At least then the stench is honest. 
Steve Conley 
%

fenris@nospam.frob.ml.org wrote:
>Compare this to my school.  Colorado School of Mines

I read this as "Colorado School of Mimes," and my first reaction was:
*Nobody* needs to recover *that* much.

Ayse Sercan 
%

  All software sucks. Everybody is considered a jerk by somebody. The sun rises, 
  the sun sets, the Sun crashes, lusers are LARTed, BOFHs get drunk. It is the 
  way of things. 
Steve Conley 
%

  101 unpleasant hangover experiences, number 72: trying to put your clothes on, 
  and they won't stop moving by themselves. i hate that. 
Tom Yates 
%

  Driscoll's Observation: The product of the IQs of each member of a 
  tech-support conversation is a constant. 
Michael Driscoll 
%

In a previous article, longword@newsguy.com said:
>[0] Unless you count an ellipsis with an extra period, which would be
>being spectacularly pedantic.
       ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
Welcome to Usenet.  Have a nice day.

Paul Tomblin 
%

  What's it called when you split them down the chest, pull their ribcage apart, 
  arrange their non-essential organs outside them, then wait for them to die? -- 
  Nigel Williams 
  Resourcing labor assets to action the vision statement. -- Mark C. Langston 
  Ah, that would explain the bloodstains on our ISO9000 handbook.... -- Lionel 
  Lauer 
%


  The only "intuitive" interface is the nipple. After that, it's all learned. 
Bruce Ediger, in comp.os.linux.misc, on X interfaces 
%

  Apparently there is a Moscow -> Ulan Bator flight, however the airport at Ulan 
  Bator freezes up every now and then. -- Chris Ebenezer 
  Have they tried rebooting? -- Joe Zeff 
  That's "Ulan Bator", not "Microsoft Lan Manager" -- Paul Tomblin 
  Hey! In the 7 years I ran LAN Manager, I almost never had to reboot. It always 
  rebooted whenever it wanted. -- Carl Schelin 
%


  There is a style of design I call "wishful thinking engineering." It starts 
  with something like "pigs can fly if you feed them enough beans" and develops 
  utopian plans such as like having everyone commute to work riding on personal 
  pigs, and along the way ignores minor details such as the consequent rain of 
  the non-gaseous byproducts. 
Vernon Schryver 
%

  Quoted-Printable: a standard for mangling Internet messages
  Quoted-Unreadable: the result of applying said standard
  Unquoted-Unprintable: the comments from the recipients of the above

bf8 
%

  I have come to believe in the Buhddist concept of reincarnation. And I swear 
  that whatever I did in a past life to deserve this I will *NEVER EVER* do 
  again. 
BroCaca 
%

  Reminds me of the feeling I get from my quicj perl hacks to do something - 
  everything hardcoded, no command line options, etc. Just feels.... quick and 
  dirty. Which for a perl hack isn't a bad thing - but for a finished commerical 
  product? Especially one that microsoft is calling Enterprise capable? 
  (whatever that means) 
  You need to re-watch some of the episodes in which the computer goes amok and 
  Kirk and Spock have to regain control from it before it destroys the ship. 
Chris Rovers, Anthony DeBoer 
%

  Especially one that microsoft is calling Enterprise capable? (whatever that 
  means) 
  Translated from microsoftese that means roughly "until now our products 
  annoyed the hell out of your systems administrators and about 10% of your 
  users, and turned the other 90% in point'n'drooling vegetables, fucked up 
  workstations and caused massive productivity loss, but now you can destroy 
  your entire company by putting this product in the server room". I must admit, 
  their version is shorter. 
Chris Rovers, Bram Smits 
%

Three servers for the admins under the influence of rye,
seven routers for the network techs in their halls of stone
Nine workstations for mortal lusers doomed to die
One NT box from the dark lord on his throne
in the land of Redmond where the shadows lie

One box to run them all, one box to blind them
one box to control them all and in the darkness grind them
from the land of Redmond where the shadows lie.

Bram Smits 
%

  How many people here have ever wanted to be able to tell a luser '"The 
  customer is always right" is fine when the issue is whether you wanted extra 
  mustard or no mustard, but does not apply when the customer in question just 
  took a bulk magnet to his hard drive'? 
Cat 
%

  Irix is about as stable as a one-legged drunk with hypothermia in a four- 
  hundred mile wind, balancing on a banana peel on a greased cookie sheet. When 
  someone throws him an elephant with bad breath and a worse temper. 
Simon Cozens 
%

  "It's 806 miles to Chicago, we've got a full tank of coffee, half a fsckload 
  of Y2K crap, it's dark, and we're wearing sunglasses." 
  "Hit it". 
adb 
%

  Security-wise, NT is a server with a "Kick me" sign taped to it. 
Peter Gutmann 
%

  Er, what does SCSI have to do with old weapons? 
  They both are better for maiming than killing? 
Lars Balker Rasmussen, Art 
%

  -grrr- Well, it's arguable whether they've begun yet... 
  What flags do you use with chmod to get flags like those? 
  The flags in question are outlined in O'Reilly's Essential Sysadmin For 
  Rednecks, the one with the Blue Tick Hound on the cover. The command is as 
  follows: 
  chmod -group +read +rite +run 
Philip Kizer, Richard Letts, Richard Letts 
%

  The day Micro$lop makes something that doesn't suck is probably the day they 
  start making vacuum cleaners. 
Ernst Jan Plugge 
%

  bing-bong. Brimish Rull regret that mumble maz bem dermumble a mir mumble 
  mumble bimble late. Passengers mizzing to mumble rimble mumble are advised to 
  momble mar at murmble. Thank you mor mumble mimbling Brimble mum. bing-bong. 
Gaz on railway announcements 
%

  the best answer when anybody asks you if you're any good with explosives is to 
  hold up two open hands and simply say "Ten". 
Anthony DeBoer 
%

  ZENgineering: v. when you've looked at the obvious to solve a problem you 
  start doing something completely different to fix it. Other examples of 
  ZENingeering solutions are: rebooting the router the opposite side of the 
  campus to where the lusers are reporting network problems (Tuesday). I have no 
  idea what the ATM bridge/router was doing to affect the network. it's not even 
  got anything plugged into the ethernet interfaces, and it only has one ATM 
  port! 
Richard 
%

  Alpha port's not as cool because DEC's in bed with you-know-who, *sigh*. 
  You misspelled "tied facedown over the whipping horse without benefit of 
  lubricant". 
float, Berry Kercheval 
%

  I would be rather disappointed to have Exchange Feet. 
  I could only take three steps before I plan carefully in advance the next 
  three steps. 
  My feet would suddenly drop off at random times, whiz around the room and hide 
  themselves somewhere. Meanwhile I either crawl about looking for my feet or 
  painfully teeter around on stumps, falling constantly. Occasionally I'd bleed 
  to death. 
  When getting new shoes, I'd have to get two pairs of the same style. I could 
  never be sure that I'd have a right foot on my right leg and a left foot on my 
  left leg. Sometimes this would be reversed or I'd have two of the same type of 
  foot. 
  I would rue the day when the Toenail Wizard comes out. Among other things, the 
  need to clip my toenails would be obviated. Of course, they wouldn't be 
  clipped properly and I'd be cursed with ingrown toenails. 
  I'm not a hobbit, nor do I want to preview being one and please don't demo the 
  foot hair on the sole either. 
David Griffith 
%

  I've found that nurturing one's Zen nature is vital to dealing with 
  technology. Violence is pretty damn useful too. 
Lionel Lauer 
%

  This FPOS is the debilitating proof of the bitter necessity of having the word 
  "Crapware" in one's vocabulary. 
Ernst Jan Plugge 
%

  To sysadmin or not to sysadmin... that is the question, whether tis nobler in 
  the minde to suffer the slings and arrowes of outragious fortune, or climb to 
  the top of the building with a fucking high-power rifle and scope. 
Greg "Twotone" Spiegelberg 
%

  [It] contains "vegetable stabilizer" which sounds ominous. How unstable are 
  vegetables? 
Jeff Zahn 
%

  I figure I'll have about 30 kids and six or seven generations down the road 
  I'll have my own fair-size nation to rule over. And when we get nukes, as we 
  surely shall, we shall wage unlimited war against the Empire of Microsoft. 
Joe "Barry G." Thompson 
%

  It must be too little caffeine in my bloodstream. 
  ITYM "too much blood in my caffeine stream". HTH. HAND. 
scorpios, Art 
%

  I think that when they use NT for controlling their weapons, any place far 
  away from strategic objects might exactly be the place where the first strikes 
  hit. 
Georg 
%

  The same people that tell you that a Linux program is as good as a WinNT 
  program would also tell you it's better to wipe your ass with a belt sander 
  instead of toilet paper. I can hear them now -- "It may not look as good but 
  it's faster and does a more thorough job! 
  -- Anonymous Luser 
  Don't bother arguing with a Windows User. The same people that tell you that a 
  Windows program is as good as a Linux program would also tell you it's better 
  to wipe your ass with your bare friggin hand instead of toilet paper. I can 
  hear them now -- "It might not work as well, it might piss you off, it might 
  be a whole lot messier....but it's easier to learn, even a child can do 
  it...and it's much more colorful!" 
  -- Brian J.S. Miller 
%


  My definition of a "Power User" (the l is silent and invisible) is somebody 
  who successfully weasels the best and most powerful computers in the office, 
  far better and bigger than the ones the productive staff are getting. He then 
  uses all that massive power to spend his entire day tweaking the look and feel 
  of his desktop and mac-dinking his documents, most of which are full of 
  terrible grammar, spelling and incoherent thoughts that never-the-less made it 
  past his state-of-the-art word processor's spelling and grammar check. It's 
  usually just as well that his thoughts are incoherent because if you could 
  understand them, you'd run screaming from the room. Regardless, because of his 
  aura of superiority that his equally pointy haired bosses buy into, these 
  incoherent ideas will become cast-in-concrete policy and no amount of counter 
  arguments, factual refutation or ranting and raving will reverse. He will ask 
  you for help to print his documents, every single time. He will demand his own 
  personal laser printer because the shared one is too far to walk, and will get 
  it because he'll justify it as a security requirement. Then he'll make you set 
  it up for him. He'll run a screen saver that chews up all the processor power 
  so you can't even run RC5 on his machine. Three days after the screen saver 
  activates he'll ask you what the password is. He'll talk into his mouse 
  thinking it's a microphone. He'll put all his files in the root directory 
  because he doesn't know how to use subdirectories. When he fills up the root 
  directory's file table, he'll buy another hard disk. He will continue this 
  until he has a huge disk farm of disks with 127(?) files on each. His 24" 
  super-duper monitor will be set up for 640x480 and 16 colours at 35Hz 
  (Interlaced) because he didn't know that it's not set up to the 1600x1280, 24 
  bit at 100Hz that it's capable of. If you point this out to him he'll scoff at 
  you and tell you why it only *looks* like it's misconfigured, but he likes it 
  this way. Several days later he'll ask you to fix it for him. When you do, 
  he'll complain that now all the letters are really little because he can't 
  figure out how to increase font sizes. He'll ask you why he doesn't have an 
  "any" key, and will try and order a new keyboard. He'll demand a 32x CD-ROM, 
  then use it as a cup-holder. He'll order a tape backup system (in spite of the 
  fact that you have networked backups), but never use it. He will fold a 5.25" 
  floppy disk to put it in the 3.5" disk slot. He'll put a 3.5" floppy disk in 
  the CD-ROM drive. He'll download software from pirate BBSes and infect his 
  computer with a virus. In order to see if the software is infected, he'll load 
  it onto the network file server, thereby infecting all the PCs on your 
  network. Even though he knows nothing of the backup cycle, he'll magically 
  know when the last uninfected backup has been sent off-site before he'll tell 
  you about his problems. 
  He'll install Windows 98. 
Paul Tomblin 
%

  ...which gives the server a futuristic, serverish, 'Don't touch me, or I will 
  put a printer up your ass!', kind of look. 
Nir Soffer 
%

  ...the Windows NT machines at work work much like the reannual wine of the 
  Discworld. They reboot as a reaction to the crash they will have later that 
  day. 
Art 
%

  There seem to be two kinds of linux users, those who come from a unix 
  background and those who come from an ibm-pc background. You could call them 
  "sysadmins" and "lusers". 
flaps 
%

  Dennis Ritchie: "So fsck was originally called something else"
  Question: "What was it called?"
  Dennis Ritchie: Well, the second letter was different. 
Q&A at Usenix 
%

  Re: a looney spammer 
  Have faith in Darwin... By the looks of it, this guy couldn't reproduce 
  himself if he had an installation wizard. 
Andreas Skau 
%

  A week in [MS Exchange] class, and he doesn't even know how to make the thing 
  speak SMTP. -- Jason Wright 
  Oh, it does actually speak some industry standards?? -- John Riddoch 
  Well, not so much /speak/ it, as mumble it. -- Lionel Lauer 
  In heavily-accented pidgin. -- Brandon Allbery 
  Through a very solid door; locked and barred with a bucket of soapy water 
  above it. -- Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%


  Re: bad writing 
  And where else in the world can you find dialogue like that... in the middle 
  of desperate combat situations the commanders quote useless part numbers and 
  factory models at each other!? 
  -- Lorens Kockum 
  Sounds to me like a fault call to HP tech support. 
  -- Malcolm Ray 
%


  More, I think, that a burden shared is one halved. It's comforting to know 
  that the clueless I face, I do not face alone. For yea, though I walk through 
  the valley of the shadow of cluelessness, I shall fear not the lusers I see, 
  for I am the meanest BOFH with a LART they ever thought they could piss 
  off.... and live. 
  "My BOFH is an Old Testament BOFH - a lot of smiting, a lot of LARTing, all 
  the good stuff". 
Chris "Saundo" Saunderson 
%

  So I'm waiting around after hours here at BFC, because we've got a bad 4mm DAT 
  drive attached to the file server in our lab, and the daily and weekly backups 
  are therefore suspect. Also the disk drives are making that sound which says, 
  "I'm a happy drive. I'm a cheerful drive. I'm smiling at you because I'm 
  grinding my spindles into microscopic dust and there's not a single thing you 
  can do about it. I'm going to fail. I'm going to do it soon. Or later. I'm not 
  telling. Probably soon, because I've been chatting with the DAT drive two hops 
  up the SCSI chain, and he tells me that he's been ill, so if I fail *now*, 
  you'll have no recent backups. That's why I'm happy. I'm in control. I want a 
  goat. And candles. Black ones. Pray, human. Pray that I'm in a good mood. 
  PRAY, DAMMIT, ON YOUR KNEES, YOU LIMACEOUS BIT OF MEATWARE!" 
  I digress. 
Carl Jacobs 
%

  I find that anthropomorphism really doesn't help me deal with hardware all 
  that much, because it lends a certain attitude of disdain to what would 
  otherwise be a mere malfunction. 
Carl Jacobs 
%
  NASA uses Windows? Oh great. If Apollo 13 went off course today the manual 
  would just tell them to open the airlock, flush the astronauts out, and 
  re-install new ones. 
Kibo 
%
  Sanity is like money; you should just have enough to get by. Any more and you 
  turn into a freak. 
%
You can't fake what you don't have.
%
Fscking. Just Fscking.
%
Bloody wonderful.
%
<The look you get just before the killing spree.>
%
"Pooh goes psycho."
%
Eudoria.
%
Anyone got a Pop-LART?
%
If he did not want them LARTed, god would not have made them lusers.
%
Today is the first day of the rest of your life.  Give up now.
%
Rape, plunder, then burn.
%
"What was your user name again?"
%
<clickety-click>
%
So many lusers, so little ammunition.
%
"Just as happy as if we were in our right minds."
%
Endora <with a knowing look>
%
Let's not ask any questions we don't really want to hear the answers to. 
%
oderint dum metuant - let them hate so long as they fear
%
Some people are only alive because it's illegal to kill them.
%
Time to update my resume.
%
Why take the trouble of doing a ps and selective kill processes? I had nothing running on that machine....
%
Welcome to asr - where EVERY day can be a Monday!
%
There is no problem that can't be made better by sacrificing sales-weasels.
%
00. Sit back, my children, and let me tell you a story of Might and Power.
    A story of the One who delivered us from Darkness into the Glorious 
    Light of our chosen Profession.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
01. Way back in the Darkest Ages of this new world,

02. say, 1970,

03  Our People, the System and Network Administrators, were among the
    lowest children under the Heavens. 
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
04  We had no arms, and could not grasp for a better life. We had no legs,
    and could not walk upright across this world as men, but were forced 
    to crawl upon our bellies, even as the lowly serpent. And dust was our
    sustenance.
05. Mighty was the User, and fickle, and presumtuous. Unheedful of the
    Administrator, was he, and abusive of the System upon which he worked.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
06. And Our People, who feasted on dust and mud, had a mantra which was
    our only right and providence in this world. It was the first thing
    we screamed with our pink, new lungs upon entering the bleak and
    tainted Earth. It was the last statement dragged from our black and
    rusted throats upon departing this plain for our Eternal Punishment.
    It was our only weapon in a realm which knew no pity and no gratitude,
    and it was that phrase most often uttered from our dripping, filth
    encrusted jaws.

07. That mantra was "Oh, shit."
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
08. Little would this hollow statement shelter us from the elements, and
    faint protection could it offer from the lashings and tortured,
    animal questions of our Users. Nothing but a thin blanket of shame
    did it offer; and often did we find ourselves, alone, lonely, cowering
    under our laminate topped particleboard desks like infants and
    wimpering the mantra from chilly lips, where the dreaded words
    "You have new mail" flashed malevolently at us, and the Users laughed
    our our sallow lamentations.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
09. It appeared as though our lot were cast in steel and plastic as strong
    and cold as that which housed the microcircuits which earned our
    meager ration of two loaves of flat stale bread and a thermos of
    coffee each week. 
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
0A. And even as our numbers swelled to feed the bloated, mindless hordes
    of Users, so did our misery grow till even all the vast tomes of
    the regional and international standards committees could not hold
    the tales of our woes. For scarce could one draw breath without the
    Users putting magnets on the Great Disks, or spilling mead in the
    keyboards.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
0B. And ever were we called upon to restore the bits and bytes of floppy
    disks which had been used as coasters, or punch cards folded into
    many pieces and left carelessly in laundry baskets.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
0C. Below the Great Towers of the Coasts, the campuses of Cambridge and
    Palo Alto, in sacred groves far from the prying eyes of our cruel
    Users, the Administrators would meet and raise their voices to the
    Heavens crying:
0D. "Please! Haynie and Cray, Please Kerninghan, and Ritchie, please! Do
    not forsake us, your forgotten children! We who strive only to make
    your favored children's lives more efficient and uncluttered! We who
    clean up after their blemishes and, with quiet pride do allow their
    great tasks to be more easily accomplished!"
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
0E. But the gods turned a deaf ear to their forgotten children, and 
    dreamed their dreams of a day when we would not be needed: when
    all would be so easily done that no one need maintain the great
    machines and the endless miles of cable which allowed them to speak,
    each unto the other. And the decades turned.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
0F. Then, in the earliest part of this current decade, one of our
    bretheren tired of beseeching the Heavens. He grew weary of his meager
    rations: cold coffee and flat, nearly toppingless bread. The endless
    hours spent hunting for the latest flaw in production software, or
    tracking down the heedlessly duplicated network addresses somewhere in
    the dark pool of the secretaries.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
10. So it came to pass that one day a paper envelope was delivered unto
    his desk demanding that he account for why he had never taken his
    two week vacation in all his years of toil, and vehemently informing
    him that his gross transgression would earn him two weeks of unpaid
    leave, effective imediately. He did not take his tale to the cruel
    masters in Human Resources, but instead packed him up his meager 
    belongings and crawled away from the campus.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
11. Without stopping did he pass the groves of lamentation and beyond
    the trammeled realms of his Caste and enter into the unknown lands
    outside.
12. Since he was without pay, even the flat bread and thermos which were
    his normal due, he placed himself outside a delicatessen, and there
    fasted for many days and nights.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
13. In the glowing neon illuminate of that eatery did our brother enter
    into a state of consciousness none had travelled before and felt
    his spirit cleansed with fire and electricity as he walked with
    two legs down paths none has travelled then or since. 
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
14. After a time, he came before a golden throne inset with voltage meters
    and punchdown tools, RJ-45 crimpers and fiber splicers, reference
    manuals, cotton swabs, freon canisters and all the other tools of our
    Profession.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
15. And seated on the throne was a Beast of pure darkness, wrapped from
    head to feet in purest shadow, save for its eyes which glowed like
    bluest LEDs and told of uncollided traffic approaching wire speed.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
16. And the Beast gazed upon our Brother for a timeless instant, before
    speaking in a voice like read heads chewing through a VP's personal
    kiddie pr0n collection. It said:
17. "Lo, my son. None shall look after you, the fatherless children of
    this brave new world. And none shall give you chocolate covered
    coffee beans when you are weary. And you shall never see a stock
    option nor a raise in salary. And you shall ever eat dust and flat,
    stale bread with no toppings. And you shall pass in obscurity even
    as you were born. This is how it was written in the days before
    your kind were even created."
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
18. And our brother knew this to be one of the dark gods who lingers in
    the bowels of fire and passes no judgement upon the wills of Man, but
    revels only in his pain. And he responded
19. "This is ever the way it has been with us, for we are the fatherless
    children of this new world, and we make no fame nor glory for our
    Users, but only keep their data flowing properly across the brittle
    and archaic cable plants."
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
1A. And the Beast responded "Yes, but you *can* walk on two legs, as do
    the favored children, and you *can* have arms to grasp for better
    circumstance, and, verily, even could you have weapons of Nerf, and
    build monuments of Lego and cellular phones and options of stock
    and three weeks paid vacation. For though it is written that this
    is denied to you I am not one who follows rules such as this, and
    I have many teachings to impart. But the cost would be beyond measure,
    that even your Soul must be forfeit unto me."
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
1B. And then our brother knew that he was being tempted by a beast of
    villainry, and that his answer, were he weak, could even shake the
    rafters of Heaven and IBM, turning all his Industry atop its head
    and causing plagues, famines, darkness and departmental
    reorganizations, downsizing, executive meetings, team-building
    exercizes, org charts and even the dreaded appearance of Management
    Consultants.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
1C. "Gladly do I accept, oh Beast," responded the brother, for he knew
    that this dark shadow had been with him when his disks were stopped
    and his network dropping packets, "for you have ever helped me through
    the bad times and chaos. And my soul is hard and dense already, and
    I have everything to gain."
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
1D. Then did the Beast smile from his throne, and laugh so that his shadow 
    cloak did part in places, and reveal the gruesome flame within.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
1E. "Good, my son without a father, then lean closer. For I have much
    to tell and time is short: Already does the NT fileserver in
    accounting corrupt its Registry, and you will be summoned back
    before the bells toll midnight."
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
1F. And then did our brother's ghostly limbs become real and solid, and
    arms were granted him, that he might grasp. Nerf guns were heaped
    at his feet and a jewelled crown set atop his head. And much did
    the Dark One teach him of the ways of reciprocity and one-upmanship,
    viciousness and cunning. He taught him of the dark joy of the
    capricious 'newfs'; of tricking the Employers into revealing all, yea
    even their usernames.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
20. So it came to pass that our brother awoke from his slumber of 14 days
    and 14 nights, and Lo! For he found that he had legs with which to
    walk and arms with which to grasp. And he picked himself up off of
    the ground and entered the delicatessin, where he ordered fresh
    coffee and a bagel, which he charged to the Company.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
21. Although his pager was urgently demanding attention, rather did our
    brother cast off his rags and old checkered polyesther slacks and
    enter naked into The Mall, there to buy italian clothes from pompous
    youths who sneared at him and demanded "How will you pay for this
    finery? You who come naked amongst us and have the taint of admin-
    hood about you?"
22. But the Master, for master he now was, only smiled at them and said
    "I do not think that this will be a problem."
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
23. And so he clothed himself in finery, and exited the Mall, stopping
    only long enough to disconnect the data lines from those stores
    where they had taunted him. And the Dark One saw, and knew that this
    was Good.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%

24. Then, clothed in new finery and walking upon two legs as other men,
    the Master returned to his campus and there passed by the groves
    of lamentation, where other admins saw him and cowered in fear.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
25. "Brother," they said unto him, "how camest thou by the limbs of men,
    and why dost thou dress in such finery? When the Users view your
    audacity, you shall surely be cast from this Employment, labelled
    as an Independent Contractor and driven from the lands.

26. But the Master only looked at them and smiled.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
27. "Nay, my brothers," he responded, "For their NT servers fail, and
    the network dropeth packets like dung from a camel. They shall
    not replace me; for who shall unravel my hacks and ploys, I who
    have never stopped to document?"

28. And the assembled knew him, and named him "Bastard," and great was
    their rejoicing.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
29. So it came that a great procession followed the Bastard as he walked
    to the Campus and entered into it from the Great Entrance in front.
    And his followers gasped in awe at the splendor of this great
    Lobby, for none before had seen it, them being forced to go up
    freight elevators and stairwells which smelled of the urine of the
    elderly since before the dawn of this age.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
2A. But the Bastard paid no heed to all this finery, for he was wise and
    knew that it was there only to frighten and awe him. But he proceeded
    straight to the elevators and went up to the 13th floor, that hall
    of stagnant damnation known always as "The Accounting Department."
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
2B. And there he found his Employer, whose name was Pain, and he walked
    up to him and smiled, but did not bow.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
2C. "What temerity is this?" demanded Pain, for he was lord of these
    lands, and took flack from neither suit nor lackey, "Bow before me, 
    or I shall cast thee from thine Employment and label thee as
    Contractor, that thou must live in torment all the days of thine
    life, forced to answer PC User questions about MS-DOS AUTOEXEC.BAT
    and perhaps design web pages just to make your meager feed!"
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
2D. But our leader, who is the Bastard Operater from Hell, only laughed
    at Pain.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
2E. "And who shall correct thy errant NT server if I should go, Pain?
    Who shall recover the data from your abused floppy disks, and who
    shall watch these herds of Unixen and VAX when I am gone? Lastly,
    Pain, who shall resusitate your damaged NT file servers, those which
    I wisely begged you not to purchase, when I am cast into the Void?"
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
2F. And Pain bristled with anger and shame, for he knew that NT was a
    poor choice of server, and that the blessed days of an adminless
    world were a hoax. His gods had lied to and then deserted him.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
30. Then did our Master make his demands of Pain: that Admins should be
    given Chocolate Covered Coffee Beans and flat, fresh bread with many
    toppings. That we should be given options of stock, and cellular
    phones. Legos and weapons of Nerf.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
31. Even as the NT server gasped its last breath did Pain acquiesce to
    our Master's demands. At that moment, all the Admins of the land
    were given arms and legs. The gods, who so long had ignored our
    pleas and upon whose deaf ears had the groves been built and
    flourished, could not wait to heap reward upon us.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
32. And then were all the Users stooped with shame and hackled and made
    as beasts of the land, that ever after were they called the Lusers.
    And now do they tremble at our coming and gladly take our wild
    lashings and verbal abuse. And wait upon us, hands and feet, that 
    they might bathe in the light of our wisdom. We who stride like
    giants across the world and allow all the systems to speak, each
    unto the other.
	-- "HOW THE BASTARD OPERATER CAME AMONGST HIS CHILDREN"
%
